Vermont, session 2025-2026, H141.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
10 Sec. 1. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.105 is amended to read:
11 Sec. B.105 Agency of digital services -communications and information
12 technology
13 Personal services 82,994,362 82,994,362
14 Operating expenses 62,547,212 61,761,212
15 Total 145,541,574 144,755,574
16 Source of funds
17 General fund 209,808 209,808
18 Special funds 511,723 511,723
19 Internal service funds 144,820,043 144,034,043

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 2 of 147
1 Total 145,541,574 144,755,574
2 Sec. 2. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.145 is amended to read:
3 Sec. B.145 Total general government
4 Source of funds
5 General fund 117,405,610 117,405,610
6 Transportation fund 4,292,149 4,292,149
7 Special funds 31,882,209 31,882,209
8 Federal funds 1,467,374 1,467,374
9 Internal service funds 214,635,950 213,849,950
10 Interdepartmental transfers 7,053,789 7,053,789
11 Enterprise funds 4,298 4,298
12 Pension trust funds 4,800,305 4,800,305
13 Private purpose trust funds 1,329,205 1,329,205
14 Total 382,870,889 382,084,889
15 Sec. 3. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.204 is amended to read:
16 Sec. B.204 Judiciary
17 Personal services 58,439,095 58,827,799
18 Operating expenses 12,479,384 14,640,960
19 Grants 121,030 121,030
20 Total 71,039,509 73,589,789
21 Source of funds

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 3 of 147
1 General fund 63,414,698 65,964,978
2 Special funds 4,503,401 4,503,401
3 Federal funds 953,928 953,928
4 Interdepartmental transfers 2,167,482 2,167,482
5 Total 71,039,509 73,589,789
6 Sec. 4. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.205 is amended to read:
7 Sec. B.205 State’s attorneys
8 Personal services 17,309,679 17,503,709
9 Operating expenses 2,034,016 2,247,786
10 Total 19,343,695 19,751,495
11 Source of funds
12 General fund 18,734,634 19,142,434
13 Federal funds 31,000 31,000
14 Interdepartmental transfers 578,061 578,061
15 Total 19,343,695 19,751,495
16 Sec. 5. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.206.1 is amended to read:
17 Sec. B.206.1 Crime Victims Advocates
18 Personal services 3,016,156 3,016,156
19 Operating expenses 104,396 142,396
20 Total 3,120,552 3,158,552
21 Source of funds

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 4 of 147
1 General fund 3,120,552 3,158,552
2 Total 3,120,552 3,158,552
3 Sec. 6. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.208 is amended to read:
4 Sec. B.208 Public safety -administration
5 Personal services 4,620,756 5,397,783
6 Operating expenses 6,022,923 6,022,923
7 Total 10,643,679 11,420,706
8 Source of funds
9 General fund 6,179,193 8,092,770
10 Special funds 4,105 4,105
11 Federal funds 396,362 396,362
12 Interdepartmental transfers 4,064,019 2,927,469
13 Total 10,643,679 11,420,706
14 Sec. 7. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.210 is amended to read:
15 Sec. B.210 Public safety -criminal justice services
16 Personal services 5,387,100 4,705,897
17 Operating expenses 2,152,467 2,152,467
18 Total 7,539,567 6,858,364
19 Source of funds
20 General fund 1,829,099 2,172,295
21 Special funds 4,975,847 3,951,448

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 5 of 147
1 Federal funds 734,621 734,621
2 Total 7,539,567 6,858,364
3 Sec. 8. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.236 is amended to read:
4 Sec. B.236 Human rights commission
5 Personal services 927,697 952,559
6 Operating expenses 115,103 125,378
7 Total 1,042,800 1,077,937
8 Source of funds
9 General fund 953,800 988,937
10 Federal funds 89,000 89,000
11 Total 1,042,800 1,077,937
12 Sec. 9. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.241 is amended to read:
13 Sec. B.241 Total protection to persons and property
14 Source of funds
15 General fund 228,238,448 233,526,438
16 Transportation fund 20,250,000 20,250,000
17 Special funds 119,824,272 118,799,873
18 Tobacco fund 672,579 672,579
19 Federal funds 162,959,452 162,959,452
20 Interdepartmental transfers 16,031,869 14,895,319
21 Enterprise funds 15,070,107 15,070,107

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 6 of 147
1 Total 563,046,727 566,173,768
2 Sec. 10. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.300 is amended to read:
3 Sec. B.300 Human services -agency of human services -secretary’s office
4 Personal services 16,219,746 18,219,746
5 Operating expenses 7,220,486 6,062,286
6 Grants 3,795,202 3,795,202
7 Total 27,235,434 28,077,234
8 Source of funds
9 General fund 12,913,202 11,923,905
10 Special funds 135,517 135,517
11 Federal funds 13,565,080 11,606,177
12 Global Commitment fund 0 4,300,000
13 Interdepartmental transfers 621,635 111,635
14 Total 27,235,434 28,077,234
15 Sec. 11. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.301 is amended to read:
16 Sec. B.301 Secretary’s office -global commitment
17 Grants 2,039,512,9112,164,607,988
18 Total 2,039,512,9112,164,607,988
19 Source of funds
20 General fund 668,380,623 716,109,638
21 Special funds 32,047,905 32,047,905

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 7 of 147
1 Tobacco fund 21,049,373 21,049,373
2 State health care resources fund 28,053,557 28,053,557
3 Federal funds 1,285,494,2431,363,223,270
4 Interdepartmental transfers 4,487,210 4,124,245
5 Total 2,039,512,9112,164,607,988
6 Sec. 12. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.305 is amended to read:
7 Sec. B.305 AHS -administrative fund
8 Personal services 330,000 330,000
9 Operating expenses 13,170,000 16,870,000
10 Total 13,500,000 17,200,000
11 Source of funds
12 Interdepartmental transfers 13,500,000 17,200,000
13 Total 13,500,000 17,200,000
14 Sec. 13. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.306 is amended to read:
15 Sec. B.306 Department of Vermont health access -administration
16 Personal services 134,929,148 136,693,560
17 Operating expenses 44,171,193 39,250,661
18 Grants 3,112,301 3,112,301
19 Total 182,212,642 179,056,522
20 Source of funds
21 General fund 39,872,315 42,023,781

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 8 of 147
1 Special funds 4,733,015 4,733,015
2 Federal funds 128,790,580 124,836,223
3 Global Commitment fund 4,308,574 4,308,574
4 Interdepartmental transfers 4,508,158 3,154,929
5 Total 182,212,642 179,056,522
6 Sec. 14. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.307 is amended to read:
7 Sec. B.307 Department of Vermont health access -Medicaid program –
8 global commitment
9 Personal services 547,983 547,983
10 Grants 899,550,794 964,407,046
11 Total 900,098,777 964,955,029
12 Source of funds
13 Global Commitment fund 900,098,777 964,955,029
14 Total 900,098,777 964,955,029
15 Sec. 15. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.309 is amended to read:
16 Sec. B.309 Department of Vermont health access -Medicaid program –
17 state only
18 Grants 63,033,948 67,780,595
19 Total 63,033,948 67,780,595
20 Source of funds
21 General fund 62,151,546 62,308,757

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 9 of 147
1 Global Commitment fund 882,402 5,471,838
2 Total 63,033,948 67,780,595
3 Sec. 16. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.310 is amended to read:
4 Sec. B.310 Department of Vermont health access -Medicaid non-waiver
5 matched
6 Grants 34,994,888 38,232,431
7 Total 34,994,888 38,232,431
8 Source of funds
9 General fund 12,511,405 13,459,034
10 Federal funds 22,483,483 24,773,397
11 Total 34,994,888 38,232,431
12 Sec. 17. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.311 is amended to read:
13 Sec. B.311 Health -administration and support
14 Personal services 8,373,168 8,373,168
15 Operating expenses 7,519,722 8,166,662
16 Grants 7,985,727 7,985,727
17 Total 23,878,617 24,525,557
18 Source of funds
19 General fund 3,189,843 3,513,313
20 Special funds 2,308,186 2,308,186
21 Federal funds 11,040,433 11,363,903

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 10 of 147
1 Global Commitment fund 7,173,924 7,173,924
2 Interdepartmental transfers 166,231 166,231
3 Total 23,878,617 24,525,557
4 Sec. 18. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.312 is amended to read:
5 Sec. B.312 Health -public health
6 Personal services 67,812,371 67,812,371
7 Operating expenses 11,025,497 11,025,497
8 Grants 46,766,832 46,866,832
9 Total 125,604,700 125,704,700
10 Source of funds
11 General fund 12,908,892 13,008,892
12 Special funds 24,906,804 24,906,804
13 Tobacco fund 1,088,918 1,088,918
14 Federal funds 64,038,301 64,038,301
15 Global Commitment fund 17,036,150 17,036,150
16 Interdepartmental transfers 5,600,635 5,600,635
17 Permanent trust funds 25,000 25,000
18 Total 125,604,700 125,704,700
19 Sec. 19. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.313 is amended to read:
20 Sec. B.313 Health -substance use programs
21 Personal services 6,570,967 6,570,967

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 11 of 147
1 Operating expenses 511,500 511,500
2 Grants 58,215,510 59,240,635
3 Total 65,297,977 66,323,102
4 Source of funds
5 General fund 6,672,061 7,697,186
6 Special funds 2,413,678 2,413,678
7 Tobacco fund 949,917 949,917
8 Federal funds 15,456,754 15,456,754
9 Global Commitment fund 39,805,567 39,805,567
10 Total 65,297,977 66,323,102
11 Sec. 20. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.314 is amended to read:
12 Sec. B.314 Mental health -mental health
13 Personal services 50,191,086 50,191,086
14 Operating expenses 5,517,999 5,709,973
15 Grants 270,625,138 272,536,080
16 Total 326,334,223 328,437,139
17 Source of funds
18 General fund 25,555,311 26,279,270
19 Special funds 1,718,092 1,718,092
20 Federal funds 11,436,913 12,661,803
21 Global Commitment fund 287,609,767 287,763,834

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 12 of 147
1 Interdepartmental transfers 14,140 14,140
2 Total 326,334,223 328,437,139
3 Sec. 21. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.316 is amended to read:
4 Sec. B.316 Department for children and families -administration &
5 support services
6 Personal services 46,644,080 44,844,080
7 Operating expenses 17,560,755 19,402,705
8 Grants 5,627,175 5,627,175
9 Total 69,832,010 69,873,960
10 Source of funds
11 General fund 39,722,724 40,113,958
12 Special funds 2,781,912 2,781,912
13 Federal funds 24,448,223 24,098,939
14 Global Commitment fund 2,417,024 2,417,024
15 Interdepartmental transfers 462,127 462,127
16 Total 69,832,010 69,873,960
17 Sec. 22. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.317 is amended to read:
18 Sec. B.317 Department for children and families -family services
19 Personal services 45,197,694 45,286,553
20 Operating expenses 5,315,309 5,315,309
21 Grants 98,251,027 97,732,465

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 13 of 147
1 Total 148,764,030 148,334,327
2 Source of funds
3 General fund 58,838,741 59,984,059
4 Special funds 729,587 729,587
5 Federal funds 34,666,196 36,180,206
6 Global Commitment fund 54,514,506 51,425,475
7 Interdepartmental transfers 15,000 15,000
8 Total 148,764,030 148,334,327
9 Sec. 23. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.318 is amended to read:
10 Sec. B.318 Department for children and families -child development
11 Personal services 5,908,038 5,908,038
12 Operating expenses 813,321 813,321
13 Grants 223,329,336 211,815,836
14 Total 230,050,695 218,537,195
15 Source of funds
16 General fund 76,723,518 51,443,165
17 Special funds 96,312,000 109,512,000
18 Federal funds 43,511,414 42,902,383
19 Global Commitment fund 13,503,763 14,679,647
20 Total 230,050,695 218,537,195
21 Sec. 24. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.319 is amended to read:

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 14 of 147
1 Sec. B.319 Department for children and families -office of child support
2 Personal services 13,157,660 13,061,794
3 Operating expenses 3,759,992 3,759,992
4 Total 16,917,652 16,821,786
5 Source of funds
6 General fund 5,200,064 5,163,429
7 Special funds 455,719 455,719
8 Federal funds 10,874,269 10,815,038
9 Interdepartmental transfers 387,600 387,600
10 Total 16,917,652 16,821,786
11 Sec. 25. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.320 is amended to read:
12 Sec. B.320 Department for children and families -aid to aged, blind and
13 disabled
14 Personal services 2,252,206 2,481,741
15 Grants 10,717,444 10,369,155
16 Total 12,969,650 12,850,896
17 Source of funds
18 General fund 7,376,133 7,368,843
19 Global Commitment fund 5,593,517 5,482,053
20 Total 12,969,650 12,850,896
21 Sec. 26. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.321 is amended to read:

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 15 of 147
1 Sec. B.321 Department for children and families -general assistance
2 Personal services 15,000 15,000
3 Grants 11,054,252 10,702,625
4 Total 11,069,252 10,717,625
5 Source of funds
6 General fund 10,811,345 10,486,987
7 Federal funds 11,320 11,070
8 Global Commitment fund 246,587 219,568
9 Total 11,069,252 10,717,625
10 Sec. 27. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.322 is amended to read:
11 Sec. B.322 Department for children and families -3SquaresVT
12 Grants 44,377,812 45,677,812
13 Total 44,377,812 45,677,812
14 Source of funds
15 Federal funds 44,377,812 45,677,812
16 Total 44,377,812 45,677,812
17 Sec. 28. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.323 is amended to read:
18 Sec. B.323 Department for children and families -reach up
19 Operating expenses 23,821 23,821
20 Grants 37,230,488 36,730,493
21 Total 37,254,309 36,754,314

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 16 of 147
1 Source of funds
2 General fund 24,733,042 24,233,047
3 Special funds 5,970,229 5,970,229
4 Federal funds 2,806,330 2,806,330
5 Global Commitment fund 3,744,708 3,744,708
6 Total 37,254,309 36,754,314
7 Sec. 29. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.325 is amended to read:
8 Sec. B.325 Department for children and families -office of economic
9 opportunity
10 Personal services 817,029 1,042,639
11 Operating expenses 100,407 100,407
12 Grants 35,466,283 35,812,536
13 Total 36,383,719 36,955,582
14 Source of funds
15 General fund 28,178,010 28,687,068
16 Special funds 83,135 83,135
17 Federal funds 4,935,273 4,998,078
18 Global Commitment fund 3,187,301 3,187,301
19 Total 36,383,719 36,955,582
20 Sec. 30. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.329 is amended to read:
21 Sec. B.329 Disabilities, aging, and independent living -administration &

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 17 of 147
1 support
2 Personal services 45,217,977 46,217,977
3 Operating expenses 6,472,558 6,714,680
4 Total 51,690,535 52,932,657
5 Source of funds
6 General fund 22,916,281 24,037,342
7 Special funds 1,390,457 1,390,457
8 Federal funds 26,063,097 26,184,158
9 Global Commitment fund 35,000 35,000
10 Interdepartmental transfers 1,285,700 1,285,700
11 Total 51,690,535 52,932,657
12 Sec. 31. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.330 is amended to read:
13 Sec. B.330 Disabilities, aging, and independent living -advocacy and
14 independent living grants
15 Grants 24,571,060 24,781,798
16 Total 24,571,060 24,781,798
17 Source of funds
18 General fund 8,392,303 8,504,605
19 Federal funds 7,321,114 7,321,114
20 Global Commitment fund 8,857,643 8,956,079
21 Total 24,571,060 24,781,798

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 18 of 147
1 Sec. 32. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.332 is amended to read:
2 Sec. B.332 Disabilities, aging, and independent living -vocational
3 rehabilitation
4 Grants 10,179,845 9,179,845
5 Total 10,179,845 9,179,845
6 Source of funds
7 General fund 1,371,845 371,845
8 Federal funds 7,558,000 7,558,000
9 Interdepartmental transfers 1,250,000 1,250,000
10 Total 10,179,845 9,179,845
11 Sec. 33. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.333 is amended to read:
12 Sec. B.333 Disabilities, aging, and independent living -developmental
13 services
14 Grants 329,299,344 331,262,271
15 Total 329,299,344 331,262,271
16 Source of funds
17 General fund 132,732 132,732
18 Special funds 15,463 15,463
19 Federal funds 403,573 403,573
20 Global Commitment fund 328,697,576 330,660,503
21 Interdepartmental transfers 50,000 50,000

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 19 of 147
1 Total 329,299,344 331,262,271
2 Sec. 34. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.334 is amended to read:
3 Sec. B.334 Disabilities, aging, and independent living -TBI home and
4 community based waiver
5 Grants 6,845,005 6,864,520
6 Total 6,845,005 6,864,520
7 Source of funds
8 Global Commitment fund 6,845,005 6,864,520
9 Total 6,845,005 6,864,520
10 Sec. 35. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.334.1 is amended to read:
11 Sec. B.334.1 Disabilities, aging and independent living -Long Term Care
12 Grants 293,584,545 347,376,122
13 Total 293,584,545 347,376,122
14 Source of funds
15 General fund 498,579 498,579
16 Federal funds 2,450,000 2,450,000
17 Global Commitment fund 290,635,966 344,427,543
18 Total 293,584,545 347,376,122
19 Sec. 36. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.338 is amended to read:
20 Sec. B.338 Corrections -correctional services
21 Personal services 147,472,104 148,472,104

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 20 of 147
1 Operating expenses 24,914,205 25,249,795
2 Total 172,386,309 173,721,899
3 Source of funds
4 General fund 162,807,888 163,643,478
5 Special funds 935,963 935,963
6 ARPA State Fiscal 5,000,000 5,000,000
7 Federal funds 499,888 999,888
8 Global Commitment fund 2,746,255 2,746,255
9 Interdepartmental transfers 396,315 396,315
10 Total 172,386,309 173,721,899
11 Sec. 37. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.342 is amended to read:
12 Sec. B.342 Vermont veterans’ home -care and support services
13 Personal services 17,631,222 17,595,290
14 Operating expenses 5,013,462 13,247,462
15 Grants 0 1,583,157
16 Total 22,644,684 32,425,909
17 Source of funds
18 General fund 4,320,687 11,224,018
19 Special funds 10,051,903 12,450,095
20 Federal funds 8,272,094 8,751,796
21 Total 22,644,684 32,425,909

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 21 of 147
1 Sec. 38. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.347 is amended to read:
2 Sec. B.347 Total human services
3 Source of funds
4 General fund 1,328,118,8061,364,156,647
5 Special funds 202,800,452 218,398,644
6 Tobacco fund 23,088,208 23,088,208
7 State health care resources fund 28,053,557 28,053,557
8 ARPA State Fiscal 5,000,000 5,000,000
9 Federal funds 1,803,398,9221,882,012,745
10 Global Commitment fund 1,980,839,5532,108,560,133
11 Internal service funds 490,853 490,853
12 Interdepartmental transfers 32,893,535 34,367,341
13 Permanent trust funds 25,000 25,000
14 Total 5,404,708,8865,664,153,128
15 Sec. 39. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.501 is amended to read:
16 Sec. B.501 Education -education services
17 Personal services 28,237,700 28,312,700
18 Operating expenses 1,134,912 1,134,912
19 Grants 322,345,763 322,345,763
20 Total 351,718,375 351,793,375
21 Source of funds

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 22 of 147
1 General fund 6,387,955 6,462,955
2 Special funds 3,033,144 3,033,144
3 Tobacco fund 750,388 750,388
4 Federal funds 340,584,414 340,584,414
5 Interdepartmental transfers 962,474 962,474
6 Total 351,718,375 351,793,375
7 Sec. 40. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.503 is amended to read:
8 Sec. B.503 Education -state-placed students
9 Grants 20,000,000 19,000,000
10 Total 20,000,000 19,000,000
11 Source of funds
12 Education fund 20,000,000 19,000,000
13 Total 20,000,000 19,000,000
14 Sec. 41. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.504 is amended to read:
15 Sec. B.504 Education -adult education and literacy
16 Grants 4,694,183 4,997,820
17 Total 4,694,183 4,997,820
18 Source of funds
19 General fund 3,778,133 4,081,770
20 Federal funds 916,050 916,050
21 Total 4,694,183 4,997,820

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 23 of 147
1 Sec. 42. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.504.1 is amended to read:
2 Sec. B.504.1 Education -Flexible Pathways
3 Grants 11,361,755 11,564,179
4 Total 11,361,755 11,564,179
5 Source of funds
6 General fund 921,500 921,500
7 Education fund 10,440,255 10,642,679
8 Total 11,361,755 11,564,179
9 Sec. 43. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.505 is amended to read:
10 Sec. B.505 Education -adjusted education payment
11 Grants 1,893,267,3941,882,267,394
12 Total 1,893,267,3941,882,267,394
13 Source of funds
14 Education fund 1,893,267,3941,882,267,394
15 Total 1,893,267,3941,882,267,394
16 Sec. 44. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.508 is amended to read:
17 Sec. B.508 Education -nutrition
18 Grants 20,400,000 17,500,000
19 Total 20,400,000 17,500,000
20 Source of funds
21 Education fund 20,400,000 17,500,000

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 24 of 147
1 Total 20,400,000 17,500,000
2 Sec. 45. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.516 is amended to read:
3 Sec. B.516 Total general education
4 Source of funds
5 General fund 228,890,519 229,269,156
6 Special funds 23,651,687 23,651,687
7 Tobacco fund 750,388 750,388
8 Education fund 2,323,283,2422,308,585,666
9 Federal funds 354,654,849 354,654,849
10 Global Commitment fund 260,000 260,000
11 Interdepartmental transfers 1,467,771 1,467,771
12 Pension trust funds 3,572,780 3,572,780
13 Total 2,936,531,2362,922,212,297
14 Sec. 46. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.704 is amended to read:
15 Sec. B.704 Forests, parks and recreation -forestry
16 Personal services 7,880,566 7,913,766
17 Operating expenses 1,005,046 1,005,046
18 Grants 1,712,423 1,713,923
19 Total 10,598,035 10,632,735
20 Source of funds
21 General fund 6,299,512 6,334,212

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 25 of 147
1 Special funds 547,215 547,215
2 Federal funds 3,394,931 3,394,931
3 Interdepartmental transfers 356,377 356,377
4 Total 10,598,035 10,632,735
5 Sec. 47. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.710 is amended to read:
6 Sec. B.710 Environmental conservation -air and waste management
7 Personal services 27,995,328 27,995,328
8 Operating expenses 10,788,954 10,816,954
9 Grants 4,943,000 4,943,000
10 Total 43,727,282 43,755,282
11 Source of funds
12 General fund 199,372 227,372
13 Special funds 24,643,580 24,643,580
14 Federal funds 18,800,064 18,800,064
15 Interdepartmental transfers 84,266 84,266
16 Total 43,727,282 43,755,282
17 Sec. 48. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.711 is amended to read:
18 Sec. B.711 Environmental conservation -office of water programs
19 Personal services 50,153,806 50,153,806
20 Operating expenses 8,362,915 8,370,915
21 Grants 92,365,140 92,365,140

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 26 of 147
1 Total 150,881,861 150,889,861
2 Source of funds
3 General fund 11,887,629 11,895,629
4 Special funds 30,967,150 30,967,150
5 Federal funds 107,154,542 107,154,542
6 Interdepartmental transfers 872,540 872,540
7 Total 150,881,861 150,889,861
8 Sec. 49. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.714 is amended to read:
9 Sec. B.714 Total natural resources
10 Source of funds
11 General fund 42,792,800 42,863,500
12 Special funds 81,275,829 81,275,829
13 Fish and wildlife fund 10,418,331 10,418,331
14 Federal funds 152,068,301 152,068,301
15 Interdepartmental transfers 14,131,324 14,131,324
16 Total 300,686,585 300,757,285
17 Sec. 50. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.1100 is amended to read:
18 Sec. B.1100 MISCELLANEOUS FISCALYEAR 2025 ONE-TIME
19 APPROPRIATIONS
20 * * *

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 27 of 147
1 (d) Department of Health. In fiscal year 2025, funds are appropriated for
2 the following:
3 * * *
4 (8) $835,073 General Fund for the Bridges to Health Program; and
5 (9) $400,000 $550,000 General Fund for the Vermont Household Health
6 Insurance Survey; and
7 (10) $500,000 General Fund for community grants related to health
8 equity.
9 (e) Department for Children and Families. In fiscal year 2025, funds are
10 appropriated for the following:
11 (1) $16,500,000 $18,340,304 General Fund for the General Assistance
12 Emergency Housing program;
13 (2) $1,034,065 General Fund to extend 10 Economic Services Division
14 limited service positions, including associated operating costs, in support of
15 the General Assistance Emergency Housing program; and
16 (3) $332,000 General Fund for a 2-1-1 service line contract to operate
17 24 hours seven days per week;
18 (4) $340,000 General Fund and $660,000 federal funds for the Office of
19 Child Support mainframe transition planning. Notwithstanding 32 V.S.A.
20 § 703, unless otherwise reverted by a future act of the General Assembly, these
21 appropriations shall carry forward until fully expended; and

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 28 of 147
1 (5) $1,800,000 General Fund shall be added to the appropriation made
2 in Sec. B.1102(b)(4) of this act for the Comprehensive Child Welfare
3 Information System.
4 * * *
5 (n) Agency of Human Services Secretary’s Office. In fiscal year 2025,
6 funds are appropriated for the following:
7 (1) $3,913,200 $5,586,324 General Fund and $5,366,383 $7,713,259
8 federal funds to be used for Global Commitment match for the Medicaid
9 Global Payment Program. To the extent that at a future date the Global
10 Payment Program ceases to operate as a program or changes methodology to a
11 retrospective payment program, any resulting one-time General Fund spending
12 authority remaining at that time shall be reverted. If the Human Services
13 Caseload Reserve established in 32 V.S.A. § 308b has not been replenished in
14 accordance with subdivision (b)(21) of Sec. B.1102 of this act, the remaining
15 unallocated General Fund balance shall be reserved in the Human Services
16 Caseload Reserve established in 32 V.S.A. § 308b up to the amount
17 appropriated in this subdivision.
18 (o) Department of Vermont Health Access. In fiscal year 2025, funds are
19 appropriated for the following:
20 (1) $9,279,583 $13,299,583 Global Commitment for the Medicaid
21 Global Payment Program;

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 29 of 147
1 (2) $150,000 General Fund to conduct a technical analysis of Vermont’s
2 health insurance markets; and
3 (3) $100,000 General Fund to implement the expansion of Medicare
4 Savings Programs eligibility;
5 (4) $10,000,000 General Fund for Provider Stabilization Grants; and
6 (5) $11,000,000 General Fund for an alternative payment model
7 reconciliation payment to Brattleboro Retreat. All or a portion of these funds
8 may also be used as matching funds to the Agency of Human Services Global
9 Commitment Program to provide State match. If funds are used as matching
10 funds to the Agency of Human Services Global Commitment Program to
11 provide State match, the commensurate amount of Global Commitment Fund
12 spending authority may be requested during the Global Commitment Transfer
13 process pursuant to Sec. E.301.1 of this act.
14 * * *
15 (w) Vermont Housing and Conservation Board. In fiscal year 2025, funds
16 are appropriated for the following:
17 (1) $8,600,000 General Fund to provide support and enhance capacity
18 for the production and preservation of affordable mixed-income rental housing
19 and homeownership units, including improvements to manufactured homes
20 and communities, permanent homes and emergency shelter for those
21 experiencing homelessness, recovery residences, and housing available to farm

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 30 of 147
1 workers, refugees, and individuals who are eligible to receive Medicaid-funded
2 home-and community-based services; and
3 (2) $2,800,000 General Fund to complete pilot projects identified
4 pursuant to 2022 Acts and Resolves No. 186.
5 Sec. 51. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. D.100 is amended to read:
6 Sec. D.100 ALLOCATIONS; PROPERTY TRANSFER TAX
7 (a) This act contains the following amounts allocated to special funds that
8 receive revenue from the property transfer tax. These allocations shall not
9 exceed available revenues.
10 (1) The sum of $575,662 is allocated from the Current Use
11 Administration Special Fund to the Department of Taxes for administration of
12 the Use TaxReimbursement Program. Notwithstanding 32 V.S.A. § 9610(c),
13 amounts in excess of $575,662 from the property transfer taxdeposited into
14 the Current Use Administration Special Fund shall be transferred into the
15 General Fund.
16 (2) Notwithstanding 10 V.S.A. § 312, amounts in excess of $22,106,740
17 $28,238,050 from the property transfer taxand surcharge established in
18 32 V.S.A. § 9602a deposited into the Vermont Housing and Conservation Trust
19 Fund shall be transferred into the General Fund.
20 (A) The dedication of $2,500,000 in revenue from the property
21 transfer taxpursuant to 32 V.S.A. § 9610(d) for the debt payments on the

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 31 of 147
1 affordable housing bond pursuant to 10 V.S.A. § 314 shall be offset by the
2 reduction of $1,500,000 in the appropriation to the Vermont Housing and
3 Conservation Board and $1,000,000 from the surcharge established in
4 32 V.S.A. § 9602a. The fiscal year 2025 appropriation of $22,106,740
5 $28,238,050 to the Vermont Housing and Conservation Board reflects the
6 $1,500,000 reduction. The affordable housing bond and related property
7 transfer taxand surcharge provisions are repealed after the life of the bond on
8 July 1, 2039. Once the bond is retired, the $1,500,000 reduction in the
9 appropriation to the Vermont Housing and Conservation Board shall be
10 restored.
11 (3) Notwithstanding 24 V.S.A. § 4306(a), amounts in excess of
12 $7,772,373 $9,052,113 from the property transfer taxdeposited into the
13 Municipal and Regional Planning Fund shall be transferred into the General
14 Fund. The $7,772,373 $9,052,113 shall be allocated as follows:
15 (A) $6,404,540 $7,459,063 for disbursement to regional planning
16 commissions in a manner consistent with 24 V.S.A. § 4306(b);
17 (B) $931,773 $1,085,192 for disbursement to municipalities in a
18 manner consistent with 24 V.S.A. § 4306(b); and
19 (C) $436,060 $507,858 to the Agency of Digital Services for the
20 Vermont Center for Geographic Information.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 32 of 147
1 Sec. 52. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. D.101 is amended to read:
2 Sec. D.101 FUND TRANSFERS
3 (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the following amounts are
4 transferred from the funds indicated:
5 (1) From the General Fund to the:
6 (A) General Obligation Bonds Debt Service Fund (#35100):
7 $73,212,880 $78,235,088.34.
8 * * *
9 (J) Emergency Relief and Assistance Fund (#21555): $830,000
10 $6,500,000.
11 (K) Education Fund (#20205): $25,000,000.
12 (L) Medical Insurance Fund (#55100): $18,500,000.
13 (M) Correctional Industries Fund (#59100): $3,135,443.
14 (N) Act 250 Permit Fund (#21260): $900,000.
15 (O) State Liability Self-Insurance Fund (#56200): $3,000,000.
16 (2) From the Transportation Fund to the:
17 (A) Vermont Recreational Trails Fund (#21455): $370,000.
18 (B) Downtown Transportation and Related Capital Improvements
19 Fund (#21575): $523,966.
20 (C)(B) General Obligation Bonds Debt Service Fund (#35100):
21 $316,745.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 33 of 147
1 (D)(C) Notwithstanding 19 V.S.A. § 13(c), the Transportation Fund
2 transfer to the Central Garage fund in fiscal year 2025 shall be $0.
3 * * *
4 (b) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, in fiscal year
5 2025:
6 (1) The following amounts shall be transferred to the General Fund
7 from the funds indicated:
8 (A) Cannabis Regulation Fund (#21998): $12,000,000
9 $15,417,084.32.
10 (B) AHS Central Office Earned Federal Receipts (#22005):
11 $4,641,960.
12 (C) Sports Wagering Enterprise Fund (#50250): $7,000,000
13 $6,139,162.
14 (D) Liquor Control Fund (#50300): $21,100,000 $9,543,353.
15 (E) Tobacco Litigation Settlement Fund (#21370): $3,000,000.
16 (F) Financial Institutions Supervision Fund (#21065): $1,100,000.
17 (F) Workforce Education and Training Fund (#21913):
18 $2,598,921.75.
19 (G) Vermont Traumatic Brain Injury Fund (#21994): the balance of
20 the fund at the close of fiscal year 2025.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 34 of 147
1 (2) The following estimated amounts, which may be all or a portion of
2 unencumbered fund balances, shall be transferred from the following funds to
3 the General Fund. The Commissioner of Finance and Management shall
4 report to the Joint Fiscal Committee at its July meeting the final amounts
5 transferred from each fund and certify that such transfers will not impair the
6 agency, office, or department reliant upon each fund from meeting its statutory
7 requirements.
8 (A) AG-Fees & Reimbursements-Court Order Fund (#21638):
9 $2,000,000.
10 (B) Unclaimed Property Fund (#62100): $6,500,000 $10,995,595.
11 (3) $66,935,000 $63,560,450.50 of the net unencumbered fund balances
12 in the Insurance Regulatory and Supervision Fund (#21075), the Captive
13 Insurance Regulatory and Supervision Fund (#21085), and the Securities
14 Regulatory and Supervision Fund (#21080) shall be transferred to the General
15 Fund.
16 * * *
17 Sec. 53. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. D.102 is amended to read:
18 Sec. D.102 REVERSIONS
19 (a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, in fiscal year
20 2025, the following amounts shall revert to the General Fund from the
21 accounts indicated:

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 35 of 147
1 * * *
2 3150892104 MH – Case Management Serv $350,000.00 $350,199.34
3 * * *
4 1100892208 AOA – VT Housing Finance Agency $3,000,000.00
5 1100892403 AOA – Health Equity Community Grants $500,000.00
6 1120020000 Tuition Assistance Program $133,877.86
7 1120892401 DHR – New Position in DHR Ops $477,769.00
8 1120892402 DHR – New Position in VTHR Ops $40,726.07
9 1140010000 TaxOperation Costs $1,267,062.22
10 1140060000 Reappraisal and Listing Payments $35,270.75
11 1140070000 Use TaxReimbursement Program $37,864.25
12 1140330000 Renter Rebates $2,186,940.33
13 1140892403 Tax– Child Care Contr Positions $3,591,823.02
14 1260980000 Debt Service $235,445.15
15 1266892401 VPIC – Pension System Assets $5,000.00
16 2100892201 AG – Racial Disparities $48,465.00
17 2130400000 SIUS Parent Account $395,749.64
18 2150010000 Mil Admin/TAGO $142,789.80
19 2150050000 Mil Vet Affairs Office $100,000.00
20 2160892201 CCVS – VT Forensic Nursing $246.43
21 2160892304 CCVS – Kurn Hattin Survivor $250.00

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 36 of 147
1 2200010000 Administration Division $167,222.00
2 3310000000 Commission on Women $25,390.43
3 3330892401 GMCB – VHCURES Database Implemen $545,782.90
4 3400892111 Supp New Americans Refugee $23,431.00
5 3400892301 AHSCO – Refugee Resettlement $1,293.00
6 3420892405 HD – Regional Emergency Med $8,295.01
7 3440050000 DCFS – AABD $35,310.73
8 3440892110 DCF – Grants to Reachup $5.10
9 3440892203 DCF – Parent Child Ctrs Cap Imp $20,708.22
10 3440892214 DCF – Child Care Provider Workfor $294.79
11 4100500000 VT Department of Labor $8,000,000.00
12 5100070000 Education Services $100,000.00
13 5100892101 AOE – VSC Committee Per Diem $16,295.33
14 5100892102 AOA – Advisory Group Per Diem $9,018.00
15 5100892103 AOE – ESESAG Per Diems $8,960.00
16 5100892201 AOE – Comm Pub Sch Emp Hlth Ben $29,050.00
17 5100892202 AOE – Task Force Equit Inclusive $6,150.00
18 5100892302 AOE – Ethnic&Social Equity Per D $14,386.24
19 6100010000 Administration Management and Planning $402,052.99
20 6100040000 Property TaxAssessment Approp $11,692.11
21 6140880005 152/00 State Asst Munic Poll Cont $126.26

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 37 of 147
1 7100892301 Everyone Eats $144,565.43
2 7120892304 DED – Relocated and Remote Worker $127,314.33
3 8100002100 Department of Motor Vehicles $2,482.81
4 * * *
5 (c) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, in fiscal year
6 2025, the following amounts shall revert to the Education Fund from the
7 accounts indicated:
8 5100010000 Administration $301,041.03
9 5100050000 State-Placed Students $13,687,528.41
10 5100090000 Education Grant $359,570.31
11 5100110000 Small School Grant $593,700.00
12 5100200000 Education – Technical Education $1,802,347.44
13 5100210000 Education – Flexible Pathways $1,312,334.72
14 5100892405 AOE – Universal School Meals $6,201,479.69
15 Sec. 54. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. D.103 is amended to read:
16 Sec. D.103 RESERVES
17 (a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, in fiscal year
18 2025, the following reserve transactions shall be implemented for the funds
19 provided:
20 (1) General Fund.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 38 of 147
1 (A) Pursuant to 32 V.S.A. § 308, an estimated amount of
2 $15,168,663 $15,168,660.85 shall be added to the General Fund Budget
3 Stabilization Reserve.
4 (B) $5,480,000 shall be added to the 27/53 reserve in fiscal year
5 2025. This action is the fiscal year 2025 contribution to the reserve for the
6 53rd week of Medicaid as required by 32 V.S.A. § 308e and the 27th payroll
7 reserve as required by 32 V.S.A. § 308e.
8 (C) Notwithstanding 32 V.S.A. § 308b, $3,913,200 shall be
9 unreserved from the Human Services Caseload Reserve established within the
10 General Fund in 32 V.S.A. § 308b.
11 (D) Notwithstanding 32 V.S.A. § 308c(a), any fiscal year-end
12 balance otherwise subject to the requirements of this provision shall, instead,
13 be reserved for permanent housing, property taxrelief, and any other uses
14 determined to be in the best interests of the public in the subsequent fiscal
15 year. The requirements of this subdivision (D) shall extend past July 1 of the
16 subsequent fiscal year and expire upon completion of the current fiscal year’s
17 accounting closure period.
18 * * *
19 Sec. 55. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. E.100 is amended to read:
20 Sec. E.100 POSITIONS

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 39 of 147
1 (a) The establishment of 43 44 permanent positions is authorized in fiscal
2 year 2025 for the following:
3 (1) Permanent classified positions:
4 * * *
5 (H) Office of the Attorney General:
6 (i) one Court Diversion Assistant Director.
7 * * *
8 (c) The conversion of eight limited service positions to exempt permanent
9 status is authorized in fiscal year 2025 as follows:
10 (1) Office of the Defender General:
11 (A) one Administrative Services Tech;
12 (B) two DG IT Specialist II’s;
13 (C) one ODG Legal Assistant I;
14 (D) two Staff Attorney I’s;
15 (E) one Financial Specialist III; and
16 (F) one Admin Secretary.
17 (d) The establishment of 35 exempt limited service positions is authorized
18 in fiscal year 2025 as follows:
19 * * *
20 Sec. 56. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. E.301 is amended to read:
21 Sec. E.301 SECRETARY’S OFFICE; GLOBALCOMMITMENT

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 40 of 147
1 * * *
2 (b) In addition to the State funds appropriated in Sec. B.301 of this act, a
3 total estimated sum of $24,301,185 $28,307,335 is anticipated to be certified
4 as State matching funds under Global Commitment as follows:
5 (1) $21,295,850 $25,302,000 certified State match available from local
6 education agencies for eligible special education school-based Medicaid
7 services under Global Commitment. This amount, combined with
8 $29,204,150 $34,698,000 of federal funds appropriated in Sec. B.301 of this
9 act, equals a total estimated expenditure of $50,500,000 $60,000,000. An
10 amount equal to the amount of the federal matching funds for eligible special
11 education school-based Medicaid services under Global Commitment shall be
12 transferred from the Global Commitment Fund to the Medicaid
13 Reimbursement Special Fund created in 16 V.S.A. § 2959a.
14 (2) $3,005,335 certified State match available from local designated
15 mental health and developmental services agencies for eligible mental health
16 services provided under Global Commitment.
17 (c) Up to $4,487,210 $3,614,245 is transferred from the Agency of Human
18 Services Federal Receipts Holding Account to the Interdepartmental Transfer
19 Fund consistent with the amount appropriated in Sec. B.301 of this act.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 41 of 147
1 Sec. 57. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. G.109 is amended to read:
2 Sec. G.109 PAY ACT APPROPRIATIONS; FISCALYEARS 2025 AND
3 2026
4 (a) Executive Branch. The first and second years of the two-year
5 agreements between the State of Vermont and the Vermont State Employees’
6 Association for the Defender General, Non-Management, Supervisory, and
7 Corrections bargaining units, and, for the purpose of appropriation, the State’s
8 Attorneys’ offices bargaining unit, for the period of July 1, 2024 through June
9 30, 2026; the collective bargaining agreement with the Vermont Troopers’
10 Association for the period of July 1, 2024 through June 30, 2026; and salary
11 increases for employees in the Executive Branch not covered by the bargaining
12 agreements shall be funded as follows:
13 (1) Fiscal year 2025.
14 * * *
15 (D) Transfers. With due regard to the possible availability of other
16 funds, for fiscal year 2025, the Secretary of Administration may transfer from
17 the various appropriations and various funds and from the receipts of the
18 Liquor Control Board Fund such sums as the Secretary may determine to be
19 necessary to carry out the purposes of this act to the various agencies
20 supported by State funds.
21 * * *

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 42 of 147
1 (2) Fiscal year 2026.
2 * * *
3 (D) Transfers. With due regard to the possible availability of other
4 funds, for fiscal year 2026, the Secretary of Administration may transfer from
5 the various appropriations and various funds and from the receipts of the
6 Liquor Control Board Fund such sums as the Secretary may determine to be
7 necessary to carry out the purposes of this act to the various agencies
8 supported by State funds.
9 * * *
10 Sec. 58. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 145, Sec. 7 is amended to read:
11 Sec. 7. TELEPHONE TAX; REPEAL; TRANSITION
12 (a) 32 V.S.A. § 8521 (telephone personal property tax) is repealed on July
13 1, 2025 2026. The final monthly installment payment of the telephone
14 personal property taxunder 32 V.S.A. § 8521 levied on the net book value of
15 the taxpayer’s personal property as of December 31, 2024 2025 shall be due on
16 or before July 25, 2025 2026.
17 (b) 32 V.S.A. § 8522 (alternative telephone gross revenues tax) is repealed
18 on January 1, 2026 2027. The final quarterly payment of the alternative tax
19 under 32 V.S.A. § 8522 shall be due on or before January 25, 2026 2027.
20 (c) Any taxpayer who paid the alternative taximposed by 32 V.S.A. § 8522
21 prior to the repeal of the taxon January 1, 2026 2027 shall become subject to

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 43 of 147
1 the income taximposed under 32 V.S.A. chapter 151 beginning with the
2 taxpayer’s first income taxyear starting on or after January 1, 2025 2026. No
3 alternative taxunder 32 V.S.A. § 8522 shall be due for any period included in
4 the taxpayer’s income taxfiling for taxyears starting on or after January 1,
5 2025 2026.
6 (d) In fiscal year 2025 2026, the Division of Property Valuation and
7 Review of the Department of Taxes and all communications service providers
8 with taxable communications property in Vermont shall be subject to the
9 inventory and valuation provisions prescribed in 32 V.S.A. § 4452, as
10 applicable.
11 Sec. 59. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 145, Sec. 15 is amended to read:
12 Sec. 15. EFFECTIVE DATES
13 This act shall take effect on passage, except that:
14 * * *
15 (3) Secs. 8–12 (communications property tax) shall take effect on July
16 1, 2025 2026 and shall apply to grand lists lodged on or after April 1, 2025
17 2026.
18 Sec. 60. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 166, Sec. 15 is amended to read:
19 Sec. 15. TRANSFER AND APPROPRIATION
20 Notwithstanding 7 V.S.A. § 845(c), in fiscal year 2025:

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 44 of 147
1 (1) $500,000.00 is transferred from the Cannabis Regulation Fund
2 established pursuant to 7 V.S.A. § 845 to the Cannabis Business Development
3 Fund established pursuant to 7 V.S.A. § 987; and
4 (2) $500,000.00 is appropriated from the Cannabis Business 19
5 Development Fund to the Agency of Commerce and Community Development
6 Department of Economic Development to fund technical assistance and
7 provide loans and grants pursuant to 7 V.S.A. § 987.
8 Sec. 61. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 181, Sec. 78 is amended to read:
9 Sec. 78. TRANSFERS; PROPERTY TRANSFER TAX
10 Notwithstanding 10 V.S.A. § 312, 24 V.S.A. § 4306(a), 32 V.S.A. §
11 9610(c), or any other provision of law to the contrary, amounts in excess of
12 $32,954,775.00 from the property transfer taxshall be transferred into the
13 General Fund. Of this amount:
14 (1) $6,106,335.00 shall be transferred from the General Fund into the
15 Vermont Housing and Conservation Trust Fund.
16 (2) $1,279,740.00 shall be transferred from the General Fund into the
17 Municipal and Regional Planning Fund. [Repealed.]
18 Sec. 62. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 181, Sec. 96 is amended to read:
19 Sec. 96. APPROPRIATION; RENT ARREARS ASSISTANCE FUND
20 The sum of $2,500,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund to the
21 Vermont State Housing Authority Department of Housing and Community

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 45 of 147
1 Development in fiscal year 2025 for the Rent Arrears Assistance Fund
2 established by 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 47, Sec. 45.
3 Sec. 63. 2022 Acts and Resolves No. 182, Sec. 3, as amended by 2023 Acts
4 and Resolves No. 3, Sec. 75, 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 78, Sec. C.119, and
5 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 181, Sec. 106, is further amended to read:
6 Sec. 3. MANUFACTURED HOME IMPROVEMENT AND
7 REPAIR PROGRAM
8 (a) Amounts Of the amounts available from the American Rescue Plan Act
9 – State Fiscal Recovery funds, $4,000,000 is appropriated to the Department
10 of Housing and Community Development for the Manufactured Home
11 Improvement and Repair Program and shall be used for one or more of the
12 following purposes:
13 * * *
14 Sec. 64. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 181, Sec. 113b is amended to read:
15 Sec. 113b. APPROPRIATION; NATURALRESOURCES BOARD
16 The sum of $1,300,000.00 $400,000 is appropriated from the General Fund
17 to the Natural Resources Land Use Review Board in fiscal year 2025.
18 Sec. 65. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 183, Sec. 24a is amended to read:
19 Sec. 24a. COMPENSATION FOR OVERPAYMENT
20 (a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the sum of
21 $29,224.00 a $29,224 credit shall be transferred from the Education Fund to

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 46 of 147
1 the Town of applied to the Canaan Town School District’s education spending,
2 as defined per 16 V.S.A. § 4001(6), in fiscal year 2025 to compensate the
3 homestead taxpayers of the Town of Canaan Town School District for an
4 overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024 due to erroneous
5 accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating average daily
6 membership. The transfer under this subsection shall be made directly to the
7 Town of Canaan.
8 (b) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the sum of
9 $5,924.00 shall be transferred from the Education Fund to the Town of
10 Bloomfield in fiscal year 2025 to compensate the homestead taxpayers of the
11 Town of Bloomfield for an overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024
12 due to erroneous accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating
13 average daily membership. The transfer under this subsection shall be made
14 directly to the Town of Bloomfield.
15 (c) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the sum of
16 $2,575.00 shall be transferred from the Education Fund to the Town of
17 Brunswick in fiscal year 2025 to compensate the homestead taxpayers of the
18 Town of Brunswick for an overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024
19 due to erroneous accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating
20 average daily membership. The transfer under this subsection shall be made
21 directly to the Town of Brunswick.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 47 of 147
1 (d) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the sum of
2 $6,145.00 shall be transferred from the Education Fund to the Town of East
3 Haven in fiscal year 2025 to compensate the homestead taxpayers of the Town
4 of East Haven for an overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024 due to
5 erroneous accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating
6 average daily membership. The transfer under this subsection shall be made
7 directly to the Town of East Haven.
8 (e) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the sum of
9 $2,046.00 shall be transferred from the Education Fund to the Town of Granby
10 in fiscal year 2025 to compensate the homestead taxpayers of the Town of
11 Granby for an overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024 due to
12 erroneous accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating
13 average daily membership. The transfer under this subsection shall be made
14 directly to the Town of Granby.
15 (f) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the sum of
16 $10,034.00 shall be transferred from the Education Fund to the Town of
17 Guildhall in fiscal year 2025 to compensate the homestead taxpayers of the
18 Town of Guildhall for an overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024
19 due to erroneous accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating
20 average daily membership. The transfer under this subsection shall be made
21 directly to the Town of Guildhall.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 48 of 147
1 (g) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the sum of
2 $20,536.00 shall be transferred from the Education Fund to the Town of Kirby
3 in fiscal year 2025 to compensate the homestead taxpayers of the Town of
4 Kirby for an overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024 due to
5 erroneous accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating
6 average daily membership. The transfer under this subsection shall be made
7 directly to the Town of Kirby.
8 (h) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the sum of
9 $2,402.00 shall be transferred from the Education Fund to the Town of
10 Lemington in fiscal year 2025 to compensate the homestead taxpayers of the
11 Town of Lemington for an overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024
12 due to erroneous accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating
13 average daily membership. The transfer under this subsection shall be made
14 directly to the Town of Lemington.
15 (i) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the sum of
16 $11,464.00 shall be transferred from the Education Fund to the Town of
17 Maidstone in fiscal year 2025 to compensate the homestead taxpayers of the
18 Town of Maidstone for an overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024
19 due to erroneous accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating
20 average daily membership. The transfer under this subsection shall be made
21 directly to the Town of Maidstone.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 49 of 147
1 (j) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the sum of
2 $4,349.00 shall be transferred from the Education Fund to the Town of Norton
3 in fiscal year 2025 to compensate the homestead taxpayers of the Town of
4 Norton for an overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024 due to
5 erroneous accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating
6 average daily membership. The transfer under this subsection shall be made
7 directly to the Town of Norton.
8 (k) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the sum of
9 $2,657.00 shall be transferred from the Education Fund to the Town of Victory
10 in fiscal year 2025 to compensate the homestead taxpayers of the Town of
11 Victory for an overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024 due to
12 erroneous accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating
13 average daily membership. The transfer under this subsection shall be made
14 directly to the Town of Victory.
15 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a $68,132 credit shall
16 be applied to the Northeast Kingdom Choice School District’s education
17 spending, as defined per 16 V.S.A. § 4001(6), in fiscal year 2025 to
18 compensate the homestead taxpayers of the Northeast Kingdom Choice School
19 District for an overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024 due to
20 erroneous accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating
21 average daily membership.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 50 of 147
1 Sec. 66. 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 78, Sec. B.1100, as amended by 2024
2 Acts and Resolves No. 87, Sec. 40 and 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec.
3 C.101, is further amended to read:
4 Sec. B.1100 MISCELLANEOUS FISCALYEAR 2024 ONE-TIME
5 APPROPRIATIONS
6 (a) Agency of Administration. In fiscal year 2024, funds are appropriated
7 for the following:
8 (1) $2,300,000 General Fund to create, implement, and oversee a
9 comprehensive statewide language access plan;.
10 (2) $15,000,000 General Fund to be used to offset the cost of denied
11 claims for Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA) federal
12 reimbursement related to presidentially declared disasters in fiscal year 2024
13 or 2025, or to fund unanticipated statewide costs related to recovery efforts
14 from declared disasters or administering programs created by funds from the
15 American Rescue Plan Act – State Fiscal Recovery Fund, including the costs
16 of related limited-service positions, and contracting for programs and services.
17 (3) $500,000 General Fund for community grants related to health
18 equity. These funds shall not be released until the recommendation and report
19 required by Sec. E.100.1 of this act, regarding the permanent administrative
20 location for the Office of Health Equity, is provided to the committees of

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 51 of 147
1 jurisdiction listed in Sec. E.100.1 of this act and the positions in the Office of
2 Health Equity created by this act are filled.
3 * * *
4 (l) Agency of Human Services Central Office. In fiscal year 2024, funds
5 are appropriated for the following:
6 * * *
7 (2) $8,834,000 General Fund and $11,483,302 Federal Revenue Fund
8 #22005 for a two-year three-year pilot to expand the Blueprint for Health Hub
9 and Spoke program. Funds shall be used to expand the substances covered by
10 the program, include mental health and pediatric screenings, and make
11 strategic investments with community partners;
12 * * *
13 (m) Department of Vermont Health Access. In fiscal year 2024, funds are
14 appropriated for the following:
15 (1) $366,066 General Fund and $372,048 Federal Revenue Fund
16 #22005 for a two-year three-year pilot to expand the Blueprint for Health Hub
17 and Spoke program;
18 (2) $15,583,352 Global Commitment Fund #20405 for a two-year three-
19 year pilot to expand the Blueprint for Health Hub and Spoke program; and
20 * * *

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 52 of 147
1 (n) Department of Health. In fiscal year 2024, funds are appropriated for
2 the following:
3 (1) $4,595,448 Global Commitment Fund #20405 to the Division of
4 Substance Use Programs for a two-year three-year pilot to expand the
5 Blueprint for Health Hub and Spoke program. Unexpended appropriations
6 shall carry forward into subsequent fiscal years and remain available for this
7 purpose;
8 * * *
9 (x) Judiciary. In fiscal year 2024, funds are appropriated for the following:
10 (1)(A) $4,680,000 General Fund for the Judiciary network replacement
11 project.
12 (B) Judiciary shall update the Joint Information Technology
13 Oversight Committee on the status of this project on or before December 1,
14 2023.
15 (2) $300,000 General Fund for the EssexCounty Courthouse renovation
16 planning. Of this amount, $50,000 may be used to construct bathrooms
17 compliant with the Americans with Disabilities Act in the EssexMeeting
18 House.
19 * * *
20 Sec. 67. 2022 Acts and Resolves No. 185, Sec. B.1102, as added by 2023 Acts
21 and Resolves No. 3, Sec. 47, is amended to read:

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 53 of 147
1 Sec. B.1102 FISCALYEAR 2023 ONE-TIME TECHNOLOGY
2 MODERNIZATION SPECIALFUND APPROPRIATIONS
3 (a) In fiscal year 2023, funds are appropriated from the Technology
4 Modernization Special Fund (21951) for new and ongoing initiatives as
5 follows:
6 (1) $40,010,000 to the Agency of Digital Services to be used as follows:
7 (A) $11,800,000 for Enterprise Resource Planning (ERP) system
8 upgrade of Human Capital Management and core statewide financial
9 accounting system and integration with the Department of Labor and Agency
10 of Transportation financial systems;
11 * * *
12 Sec. 68. 3 V.S.A. § 3306 is amended to read:
13 § 3306. TECHNOLOGY MODERNIZATION SPECIALFUND
14 * * *
15 (b) Funds. The Fund shall consist of:
16 (1) any amounts transferred or appropriated to it by the General
17 Assembly; and
18 (2) any interest earned by the Fund.
19 * * *
20 Sec. 69. WORKFORCE EDUCATION AND TRAINING FUND; REPEAL
21 (a) 10 V.S.A. § 543 (Workforce Education and Training Fund) is repealed.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 54 of 147
1 Sec. 70. 18 V.S.A. § 9502 is amended to read:
2 § 9502. TOBACCO TRUST FUND
3 (a)(1) The Tobacco Trust Fund is established in the Office of the State
4 Treasurer for the purposes of creating a self-sustaining, perpetual fund for
5 tobacco cessation and prevention that is not dependent upon tobacco sales
6 volume.
7 (2) The Trust Fund shall comprise be composed of:
8 (A) appropriations transfers made by the General Assembly; and
9 (B) transfers from the Litigation Settlement Fund pursuant to
10 subdivision (b) of this section; and
11 (C) contributions from any other source.
12 (3) The State Treasurer shall not disburse monies from the Trust Fund,
13 except upon appropriation by the General Assembly. In any fiscal year, total
14 appropriations from the Trust Fund shall not exceed seven percent of the fair
15 market value of the Fund at the end of the prior fiscal year.
16 (4) The Trust Fund shall be administered by the State Treasurer. The
17 Treasurer may invest monies in the Fund in accordance with the provisions of
18 32 V.S.A. § 434. All balances in the Fund at the end of the fiscal year shall be
19 carried forward. Interest earned shall remain in the Fund. The Treasurer’s
20 annual financial report to the Governor and the General Assembly shall
21 contain an accounting of receipts, disbursements, and earnings of the Fund.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 55 of 147
1 (b) Unless otherwise authorized by the General Assembly on or before
2 June 30, 2000, and on June 30 of each subsequent fiscal year, any
3 unencumbered balance in the Litigation Settlement Fund shall be transferred to
4 the Trust Fund. [Repealed.]
5 Sec. 71. 30 V.S.A. chapter 86 is amended to read:
6 CHAPTER 86. UNDERGROUND UTILITY DAMAGE PREVENTION
7 SYSTEM
8 * * *
9 § 7006. MARKING OF UNDERGROUND UTILITY FACILITIES
10 A company notified in accordance with section 7005 of this title shall,
11 within 48 72 hours, exclusive of Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, of the
12 receipt of the notice, mark the approximate location of its underground utility
13 facilities in the area of the proposed excavation activities; provided, however,
14 if the company advises the person that the proposed excavation area is of such
15 length or size that the company cannot reasonably mark all of the underground
16 utility facilities within 48 72 hours, the person shall notify the company of the
17 specific locations in which the excavation activities will first occur and the
18 company shall mark facilities in those locations within 48 72 hours and the
19 remaining facilities within a reasonable time thereafter. A company and an
20 excavator may by agreement fixa later time for the company’s marking of the
21 facilities, provided the marking is made prior to excavation activities. For the

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 56 of 147
1 purposes of this chapter, the approximate location of underground facilities
2 shall be marked with stakes, paint, or other physical means as designated by
3 the Commission.
4 § 7006a. MAINTENANCE OF UNDERGROUND UTILITY FACILITY
5 MARKINGS
6 After a company has marked its underground facilities in accordance with
7 section 7006 of this title, the excavator shall be responsible for maintenance of
8 the designated markings. In the event said markings are obliterated, destroyed,
9 or removed, the person engaged in excavation activities shall notify the System
10 referred to in section 7002 of this title that remarking is needed. The System
11 shall then notify all member companies whose facilities may be affected. The
12 company shall within 48 72 hours, exclusive of Saturdays, Sundays, and legal
13 holidays, following receipt of the notice, remark the location of its
14 underground utility facilities.
15 * * *
16 Sec. 72. 32 V.S.A. § 5 is amended to read:
17 § 5. ACCEPTANCE OF GRANTS
18 (a) Definitions. As used in this section:
19 (1) “Loan” means a loan that is interest free or below market value.
20 (2) “State agency” means an Executive Branch agency, department,
21 commission, office, or board.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 57 of 147
1 * * *
2 Sec. 73. 32 V.S.A. § 706 is amended to read:
3 § 706. TRANSFER OF APPROPRIATIONS
4 Notwithstanding any authority granted elsewhere, all transfers of
5 appropriations shall be made pursuant to this section upon the initiative of the
6 Governor or upon the request of a secretary or commissioner.
7 (1) With the approval of the Governor, the Commissioner of Finance
8 and Management may transfer balances of appropriations not to exceed
9 $50,000.00 $100,000.00 made under any appropriation act for the support of
10 the government from one component of an agency, department, or other unit
11 of State government to any component of the same agency, department, or
12 unit.
13 (2) Except as specified in subdivisions subdivision (1) and (4) of this
14 section, the transfer of balances of appropriations may be made only with the
15 approval of the Emergency Board.
16 (3) For the specific purpose of balancing and closing out fund accounts
17 at the end of a fiscal year, the Commissioner of Finance and Management may
18 adjust a balance within an account of an agency or department in an amount
19 not to exceed $100.00 $200.00.
20 * * *
21 Sec. 74. 32 V.S.A. § 902 is amended to read:

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 58 of 147
1 § 902. AUTHORIZATION TO BORROW MONEY
2 * * *
3 (b) The State Treasurer shall pay the interest on, principal of and expenses
4 of preparing, issuing, and marketing of such notes as the same fall due without
5 further order or authority from the General Fund or from the Transportation or
6 other applicable funds or from the proceeds of bonds or notes governmental
7 debt service funds established in section 951a of this chapter. The authority
8 hereby granted is in addition to and not in limitation of any other authority.
9 Such notes shall be sold at public or private sale with or without published
10 notice, as the State Treasurer may determine to be in the best interests of the
11 State.
12 Sec. 75. 32 V.S.A. § 951a is amended to read:
13 § 951a. DEBT SERVICE FUNDS
14 (a) Three governmental debt service funds are hereby established:
15 * * *
16 (b) Financial resources in each fund shall consist of appropriations by the
17 General Assembly to fulfill debt service obligations, the transfer of funding
18 sources by the General Assembly to fulfill future debt service obligations,
19 bond proceeds raised to fund a permanent reserve required by a trust
20 agreement entered into to secure bonds, transfers of appropriations effected
21 pursuant to section 706 of this title, investment income earned on balances

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 59 of 147
1 held in trust agreement accounts as required by a trust agreement, and such
2 other amounts as directed by the General Assembly or that are specifically
3 authorized by provisions of this title. Each debt service fund shall account for
4 the accumulation of resources and the fulfillment of debt service obligations
5 within the current fiscal year and the accumulation of resources for debt
6 service obligations maturing in future fiscal years.
7 * * *
8 Sec. 76. 32 V.S.A. § 954 is amended to read:
9 § 954. PROCEEDS
10 (a) The proceeds arising from the sale of bonds, inclusive of any
11 premiums, shall be applied to the purposes for which they were authorized,
12 and the purposes shall may be considered to include the expenses of preparing,
13 issuing, and marketing the bonds and any notes issued under section 955 of
14 this title, and underwriters’ fees amounts for reserves, but no purchasers of the
15 bonds shall be in any way bound to see to the proper application of the
16 proceeds. The State Treasurer shall pay the interest on, principal of,
17 investment return on, and maturity value of the bonds and notes as the same
18 fall due or accrue without further order or authority. The State Treasurer, with
19 the approval of the Governor, may establish sinking funds, reserve funds, or
20 other special funds of the State as the State Treasurer may deem for the best
21 interests of the State. To the extent not otherwise provided, the amount

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 60 of 147
1 necessary each year to fulfill the maturing principal and interest of, investment
2 return and maturity value of, and sinking fund installments on all the bonds
3 then outstanding shall be included in and made a part of the annual
4 appropriation bill for the expense of State government, and the principal and
5 interest on, investment return and maturity value of, and sinking fund
6 installments on the bonds as may come due before appropriations for their
7 fulfillment have been made shall be fulfilled from the applicable debt service
8 fund.
9 (b) The State Treasurer is authorized to allocate the estimated cost of bond
10 issuance or issuances to the entities to which funds are appropriated by a
11 capital construction act and for which bonding is required as the source of
12 funds. If estimated receipts are insufficient, the State Treasurer shall allocate
13 additional costs to the entities. Any remaining receipts shall not be expended,
14 but carried forward to be available for future capital construction acts. If the
15 source of funds appropriated by a capital construction act is other than by
16 issuance of bonds, the State Treasurer is authorized to allocate the estimated
17 cost of ongoing debt management services to the entities to which those funds
18 are appropriated shall be appropriated annually from the funds from which
19 transfers are made to fund debt service costs.
20 * * *
21 Sec. 77. VERMONT TRAUMATIC BRAIN INJURY FUND; REPEAL

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 61 of 147
1 (a) 33 V.S.A. chapter 78 (Vermont Traumatic Brain Injury Fund) is
2 repealed.
3 Sec. 78 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 47, Sec. 38 is amended to read:
4 Sec. 38. RENTALHOUSING REVOLVING LOAN PROGRAM
5 (a) Creation; administration. The Vermont Housing Finance Agency shall
6 design and implement a Rental Housing Revolving Loan Program and shall
7 create and administer a revolving loan fund to provide subsidized loans for
8 rental housing developments that serve middle-income households.
9 (b) Loans; eligibility; criteria.
10 * * *
11 (7) The Agency shall use one or more legal mechanisms to ensure that:
12 (A) a subsidized unit remains affordable to a household earning the
13 applicable percent of area median income for the longer of:
14 (i) seven years; or
15 (ii) full repayment of the loan plus three years; and
16 (B) during the affordability period determined pursuant to
17 subdivision (A) of this subdivision (7), the annual increase in rent for a
18 subsidized unit does not exceed three percent or an amount otherwise
19 authorized by the Agency.
20 * * *
21 Sec. 79. 32 V.S.A. § 308b is amended to read:

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 62 of 147
1 § 308b. HUMAN SERVICES CASELOAD RESERVE
2 (a) There is created within the General Fund a Human Services Caseload
3 Reserve. Expenditures from the Reserve shall be subject to an appropriation
4 by the General Assembly or approval by the Emergency Board. Expenditures
5 from the Reserve shall be limited to Agency of Human Services caseload-
6 related needs primarily in the Departments for Children and Families, of
7 Health, of Mental Health, of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living, of
8 Vermont Health Access, and settlement costs associated with managing the
9 Global Commitment waiver.
10 (b) The Secretary of Administration may transfer to the Human Services
11 Caseload Reserve any General Fund carry-forward carryforward directly
12 attributable to Agency of Human Services caseload reductions and the
13 effective management of related federal receipts, with the exclusion of the
14 Department of Corrections.
15 (c) The Secretary of Administration shall unreserve and transfer funds
16 from the Human Services Caseload Reserve to the Child Care Contribution
17 Special Fund established in section 10554 of this title as necessary to maintain
18 a balance that appropriately supports the State’s statutory obligations under the
19 Child Care Financial Assistance Program established in 33 V.S.A. §§ 3512 and
20 3513.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 63 of 147
1 (d) The Human Services Caseload Reserve shall contain two sub-accounts
2 subaccounts:
3 (1) A sub-account subaccount for incurred but not reported Medicaid
4 expenses. Each fiscal year beginning with fiscal year 2020, the Department of
5 Finance and Management shall adjust the amount reserved for incurred but not
6 reported Medicaid expenses to equal the amount specified in the
7 Comprehensive Annual Comprehensive Financial Report for the fiscal year
8 occurring two years prior for the estimated amount of incurred but not
9 reported Medicaid expenses associated with the current Medicaid Global
10 Commitment waiver.
11 * * *
12 Sec. 80. CHILD CARE CONTRIBUTION SPECIALFUND;
13 UNALLOCATED AND UNRESERVED BALANCE
14 (a) It is the intent of the General Assembly that any unreserved and
15 unallocated balance in the Child Care Contribution Special Fund shall remain
16 in the Fund to support the future establishment of a reserve for the Child Care
17 Financial Assistance Program.
18 Sec. 81. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS; FACILITY WORK
19 PROGRAMS; STRATEGIC PLAN
20 (a) Findings and intent.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 64 of 147
1 (1) The General Assembly finds that a significant budget deficit has
2 developed within previously existing programs despite a wage structure that
3 pays incarcerated individuals in Vermont at rates ranging from $0.25 to $1.35
4 per hour, significantly below the federal minimum wage.
5 (2) It is the intent of the General Assembly that all Department of
6 Corrections facility work programs operate in a manner that is fiscally
7 sustainable to the extent possible within current statutory limitations and
8 effective in preparing offenders for meaningful employment upon release.
9 (b) Strategic plan. On or before December 15, 2025, the Department of
10 Corrections shall, in consultation with the Department of Labor, submit a
11 strategic plan with proposed benchmarks for improvement to the House
12 Committees on Appropriations and on Corrections and Institutions and the
13 Senate Committees on Appropriations, on Institutions, and on Judiciary. The
14 strategic plan shall include:
15 (1) A business plan to improve program efficiency and self-
16 sustainability to ensure all facility work programs, including Vermont
17 Correctional Industries, vocational training programs, and other paid facility
18 duties, operate without recurring deficits.
19 (2) A comprehensive evaluation of the skills provided through facility
20 work programs to determine if those skills are transferable to employment
21 opportunities post-incarceration. The evaluation shall include consideration of

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 65 of 147
1 expanding technical training and certification opportunities that carry
2 recognized value in the labor market.
3 (3) An analysis of facility work programs to determine if each program
4 serves a sufficient portion of the incarcerated population to justify its
5 administration. The analysis shall also consider whether participants gain
6 meaningful and valuable work experiences.
7 (4) A review of wages paid to facility work program participants, the
8 implications of wage structures on program outcomes, and the appropriate use
9 of funds in relation to program objectives.
10 (c) In fiscal years 2025 and 2026, the Department of Corrections shall
11 submit timely reports to the to the House Committees on Appropriations and
12 on Corrections and Institutions and the Senate Committees on Appropriations,
13 on Institutions, and on Judiciary, or the Joint Fiscal Committee and the Joint
14 Legislative Justice Oversight Committee when the General Assembly is not in
15 session, on the development of facility work program deficits. The
16 Department shall include in these reports any financial or operational actions
17 taken to address deficits, increase oversight, and prevent future deficits.
18 Sec. 82. MEDICAID PROVIDERS WITH STABILIZATION NEEDS;
19 GRANT ELIGIBILITY
20 (a) All Vermont Medicaid participating providers with demonstrated
21 stabilization needs and a plan to achieve sustainability shall be eligible to

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 66 of 147
1 apply for funds appropriated pursuant to 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec.
2 B.1100(o)(4), including substance use residential treatment facilities, federally
3 qualified health centers, residential mental health providers, and other
4 providers of health care and human services.
5 Sec. 83. ADULT DIPLOMA PROGRAM AND HIGH SCHOOL
6 COMPLETION PROGRAM TRANSITIONALSTUDENTS
7 (a) Notwithstanding 16 V.S.A. § 945 and any other provision of law to the
8 contrary, a high school may award a high school diploma to any student who
9 meets the following criteria:
10 (1) Prior to July 1, 2024, the student was participating in the High
11 School Completion Program as the program existed under 16 V.S.A. § 943 on
12 June 30, 2024.
13 (2) The student has met the requirements of the student’s individual
14 graduation plan and would have been eligible to receive a diploma pursuant to
15 the High School Completion Program as it existed under 16 V.S.A. § 943 on
16 June 30, 2024.
17 (b) This section is repealed on July 1, 2025.
18 Sec. 84. SUPPLEMENTALNUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM;
19 DISCRETIONARY EXEMPTIONS
20 (a) In fiscal year 2025, the Department for Children and Families shall
21 fully utilize the State’s allocation of discretionary exemptions in the

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 67 of 147
1 Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program to the extent permitted by federal
2 regulation for the purpose of proactively extending benefits to individuals who
3 would otherwise experience a disruption of benefits.
4 Sec. 85. 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 19, Secs. 5 and 6 are amended to read:
5 Sec. 5. [Deleted.]
6 Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATES
7 (a) Sec. 4 (marriage licenses; 32 V.S.A. § 1712) shall take effect on July 1,
8 2023.
9 (b) Sec. 5 (marriage licenses; 32 V.S.A. § 1712) shall take effect on July 1,
10 2025.
11 (c) All other sections shall take effect 30 calendar days after passage.
12 Sec. 86. 2022 Acts and Resolves No. 83, Sec. 53, as amended by 2022 Acts
13 and Resolves No. 185, Sec. C.102 is further amended to read:
14 Sec. 53. FISCALYEAR 2022 UNALLOCATED RESERVE
15 * * *
16 (b) After meeting the requirements of subsection (a) of this section, but
17 prior to satisfying the requirements of 32 V.S.A. § 308c, the remaining
18 unreserved and undesignated funds at the close of fiscal year 2022 shall be
19 allocated to the extent available as follows:
20 * * *

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 68 of 147
1 (7) $9,600,000 is appropriated to the Judiciary, of which $3,880,000 is
2 for the reopening of the courts and $5,720,000, $4,920,000 is to replace HVAC
3 in county court houses, and $800,000 is to upgrade the network wiring and
4 security systems in county court houses.
5 * * *
6 Sec. 87. 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 69, Sec. 15b, as added by 2024 Acts and
7 Resolves No. 162, is amended to read:
8 Sec. 15b. SERGEANT AT ARMS
9 (a) The sum of $100,000.00 $100,000 is appropriated in FY fiscal year
10 2025 to the Sergeant at Arms for the following projects:
11 (1) the replacement of State House cafeteria furnishings; and
12 (2) the purchase and installation at the State House of an X-ray machine
13 designed to screen baggage.
14 Sec. 88. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. E.321 is amended to read:
15 Sec. E.321 GENERALASSISTANCE EMERGENCY HOUSING
16 * * *
17 (b)(1) General Assistance Emergency Housing shall be provided in a
18 community-based shelter whenever possible. If there is inadequate
19 community-based shelter space available within the Agency of Human
20 Services district in which the household presents itself, the household shall be
21 provided emergency housing in a hotel or motel within the district, if

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 69 of 147
1 available, until adequate community-based shelter space becomes available in
2 the district. The utilization of hotel and motel rooms pursuant to this
3 subdivision shall be capped at 1,100 rooms per night between September 15,
4 2024 through November 30, 2024 and between April 1, 2025 through June 30,
5 2025.
6 * * *
7 (3) The Department shall provide emergency winter housing to
8 households meeting the eligibility criteria in subsection (a) of this section
9 between December 1, 2024 and March 31, June 30, 2025. Emergency housing
10 in a hotel or motel provided pursuant to this subdivision shall not count toward
11 the maximum days of eligibility per 12-month period provided in subdivision
12 (2) of this subsection.
13 * * *
14 Sec. 89. CARRYFORWARD AUTHORITY
15 (a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law and subject to the approval
16 of the Secretary of Administration, General Fund, Transportation Fund,
17 Transportation Infrastructure Bond Fund, Education Fund, Technology
18 Modernization Special Fund (21951), Clean Water Fund (21932), and
19 Agricultural Water Quality Fund (21933) appropriations remaining
20 unexpended on June 30, 2025 in the Executive Branch shall be carried forward
21 and shall be designated for expenditure.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 70 of 147
1 (b) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, General
2 Fund appropriations remaining unexpended on June 30, 2025 in the Legislative
3 and Judicial Branches shall be carried forward and shall be designated for
4 expenditure.
5 Sec. 90. EFFECTIVE DATES
6 (a) This act shall take effect on passage, except that, notwithstanding
7 1 V.S.A. § 214, Sec. 65 shall take effect retroactively on July 1, 2024.
Sec. 1. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.105 is amended to read:
Sec. B.105 Agency of digital services - communications and information
technology
Personal services 82,994,362 82,994,362
Operating expenses 62,547,212 61,761,212
Total 145,541,574 144,755,574
Source of funds
General fund 209,808 209,808
Special funds 511,723 511,723
Internal service funds 144,820,043 144,034,043
Total 145,541,574 144,755,574
Sec. 2. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.145 is amended to read:
Sec. B.145 Total general government
Source of funds

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 71 of 147
General fund 117,405,610 117,405,610
Transportation fund 4,292,149 4,292,149
Special funds 31,882,209 31,882,209
Federal funds 1,467,374 1,467,374
Internal service funds 214,635,950 213,849,950
Interdepartmental transfers 7,053,789 7,053,789
Enterprise funds 4,298 4,298
Pension trust funds 4,800,305 4,800,305
Private purpose trust funds 1,329,205 1,329,205
Total 382,870,889 382,084,889
Sec. 3. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.200 is amended to read:
Sec. B.200 Attorney general
Personal services 14,435,517 14,463,317
Operating expenses 2,015,028 2,015,028
Grants 20,000 20,000
Total 16,470,545 16,498,345
Source of funds
General fund 7,391,661 7,419,461
Special funds 2,355,424 2,355,424
Tobacco fund 422,000 422,000
Federal funds 1,743,215 1,743,215

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 72 of 147
Interdepartmental transfers 4,558,245 4,558,245
Total 16,470,545 16,498,345
Sec. 4. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.204 is amended to read:
Sec. B.204 Judiciary
Personal services 58,439,095 58,827,799
Operating expenses 12,479,384 14,640,960
Grants 121,030 121,030
Total 71,039,509 73,589,789
Source of funds
General fund 63,414,698 65,964,978
Special funds 4,503,401 4,503,401
Federal funds 953,928 953,928
Interdepartmental transfers 2,167,482 2,167,482
Total 71,039,509 73,589,789
Sec. 5. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.205 is amended to read:
Sec. B.205 State’s attorneys
Personal services 17,309,679 17,548,979
Operating expenses 2,034,016 2,202,516
Total 19,343,695 19,751,495
Source of funds
General fund 18,734,634 19,142,434

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 73 of 147
Federal funds 31,000 31,000
Interdepartmental transfers 578,061 578,061
Total 19,343,695 19,751,495
Sec. 6. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.206.1 is amended to read:
Sec. B.206.1 Crime Victims Advocates
Personal services 3,016,156 3,016,156
Operating expenses 104,396 142,396
Total 3,120,552 3,158,552
Source of funds
General fund 3,120,552 3,158,552
Total 3,120,552 3,158,552
Sec. 7. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.208 is amended to read:
Sec. B.208 Public safety - administration
Personal services 4,620,756 5,397,783
Operating expenses 6,022,923 6,022,923
Total 10,643,679 11,420,706
Source of funds
General fund 6,179,193 8,092,770
Special funds 4,105 4,105
Federal funds 396,362 396,362
Interdepartmental transfers 4,064,019 2,927,469

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 74 of 147
Total 10,643,679 11,420,706
Sec. 8. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.210 is amended to read:
Sec. B.210 Public safety - criminal justice services
Personal services 5,387,100 4,705,897
Operating expenses 2,152,467 2,152,467
Total 7,539,567 6,858,364
Source of funds
General fund 1,829,099 2,172,295
Special funds 4,975,847 3,951,448
Federal funds 734,621 734,621
Total 7,539,567 6,858,364
Sec. 9. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.236 is amended to read:
Sec. B.236 Human rights commission
Personal services 927,697 992,259
Operating expenses 115,103 125,378
Total 1,042,800 1,117,637
Source of funds
General fund 953,800 1,028,637
Federal funds 89,000 89,000
Total 1,042,800 1,117,637
Sec. 10. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.241 is amended to read:

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 75 of 147
Sec. B.241 Total protection to persons and property
Source of funds
General fund 228,238,448 233,593,938
Transportation fund 20,250,000 20,250,000
Special funds 119,824,272 118,799,873
Tobacco fund 672,579 672,579
Federal funds 162,959,452 162,959,452
Interdepartmental transfers 16,031,869 14,895,319
Enterprise funds 15,070,107 15,070,107
Total 563,046,727 566,241,268
Sec. 11. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.300 is amended to read:
Sec. B.300 Human services - agency of human services - secretary’s office
Personal services 16,219,746 18,219,746
Operating expenses 7,220,486 6,062,286
Grants 3,795,202 3,795,202
Total 27,235,434 28,077,234
Source of funds
General fund 12,913,202 11,923,905
Special funds 135,517 135,517
Federal funds 13,565,080 11,606,177
Global Commitment fund 0 4,300,000

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 76 of 147
Interdepartmental transfers 621,635 111,635
Total 27,235,434 28,077,234
Sec. 12. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.301 is amended to read:
Sec. B.301 Secretary’s office - global commitment
Grants 2,039,512,9112,164,607,988
Total 2,039,512,9112,164,607,988
Source of funds
General fund 668,380,623 716,109,638
Special funds 32,047,905 32,047,905
Tobacco fund 21,049,373 21,049,373
State health care resources fund 28,053,557 28,053,557
Federal funds 1,285,494,2431,363,223,270
Interdepartmental transfers 4,487,210 4,124,245
Total 2,039,512,9112,164,607,988
Sec. 13. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.305 is amended to read:
Sec. B.305 AHS - administrative fund
Personal services 330,000 330,000
Operating expenses 13,170,000 16,870,000
Total 13,500,000 17,200,000
Source of funds
Interdepartmental transfers 13,500,000 17,200,000

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 77 of 147
Total 13,500,000 17,200,000
Sec. 14. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.306 is amended to read:
Sec. B.306 Department of Vermont health access - administration
Personal services 134,929,148 136,693,560
Operating expenses 44,171,193 39,250,661
Grants 3,112,301 3,112,301
Total 182,212,642 179,056,522
Source of funds
General fund 39,872,315 42,023,781
Special funds 4,733,015 4,733,015
Federal funds 128,790,580 124,836,223
Global Commitment fund 4,308,574 4,308,574
Interdepartmental transfers 4,508,158 3,154,929
Total 182,212,642 179,056,522
Sec. 15. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.307 is amended to read:
Sec. B.307 Department of Vermont health access - Medicaid program –
global commitment
Personal services 547,983 547,983
Grants 899,550,794 964,407,046
Total 900,098,777 964,955,029
Source of funds

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 78 of 147
Global Commitment fund 900,098,777 964,955,029
Total 900,098,777 964,955,029
Sec. 16. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.309 is amended to read:
Sec. B.309 Department of Vermont health access - Medicaid program –
state only
Grants 63,033,948 67,780,595
Total 63,033,948 67,780,595
Source of funds
General fund 62,151,546 62,308,757
Global Commitment fund 882,402 5,471,838
Total 63,033,948 67,780,595
Sec. 17. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.310 is amended to read:
Sec. B.310 Department of Vermont health access - Medicaid non-waiver
matched
Grants 34,994,888 38,232,431
Total 34,994,888 38,232,431
Source of funds
General fund 12,511,405 13,459,034
Federal funds 22,483,483 24,773,397
Total 34,994,888 38,232,431
Sec. 18. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.311 is amended to read:

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 79 of 147
Sec. B.311 Health - administration and support
Personal services 8,373,168 8,373,168
Operating expenses 7,519,722 8,166,662
Grants 7,985,727 7,985,727
Total 23,878,617 24,525,557
Source of funds
General fund 3,189,843 3,513,313
Special funds 2,308,186 2,308,186
Federal funds 11,040,433 11,363,903
Global Commitment fund 7,173,924 7,173,924
Interdepartmental transfers 166,231 166,231
Total 23,878,617 24,525,557
Sec. 19. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.312 is amended to read:
Sec. B.312 Health - public health
Personal services 67,812,371 67,812,371
Operating expenses 11,025,497 11,025,497
Grants 46,766,832 46,866,832
Total 125,604,700 125,704,700
Source of funds
General fund 12,908,892 13,008,892
Special funds 24,906,804 24,906,804

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 80 of 147
Tobacco fund 1,088,918 1,088,918
Federal funds 64,038,301 64,038,301
Global Commitment fund 17,036,150 17,036,150
Interdepartmental transfers 5,600,635 5,600,635
Permanent trust funds 25,000 25,000
Total 125,604,700 125,704,700
Sec. 20. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.313 is amended to read:
Sec. B.313 Health - substance use programs
Personal services 6,570,967 6,570,967
Operating expenses 511,500 511,500
Grants 58,215,510 59,240,635
Total 65,297,977 66,323,102
Source of funds
General fund 6,672,061 7,697,186
Special funds 2,413,678 2,413,678
Tobacco fund 949,917 949,917
Federal funds 15,456,754 15,456,754
Global Commitment fund 39,805,567 39,805,567
Total 65,297,977 66,323,102
Sec. 21. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.314 is amended to read:
Sec. B.314 Mental health - mental health

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 81 of 147
Personal services 50,191,086 50,191,086
Operating expenses 5,517,999 5,709,973
Grants 270,625,138 272,536,080
Total 326,334,223 328,437,139
Source of funds
General fund 25,555,311 26,279,270
Special funds 1,718,092 1,718,092
Federal funds 11,436,913 12,661,803
Global Commitment fund 287,609,767 287,763,834
Interdepartmental transfers 14,140 14,140
Total 326,334,223 328,437,139
Sec. 22. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.316 is amended to read:
Sec. B.316 Department for children and families - administration &
support services
Personal services 46,644,080 44,844,080
Operating expenses 17,560,755 19,402,705
Grants 5,627,175 5,627,175
Total 69,832,010 69,873,960
Source of funds
General fund 39,722,724 40,113,958
Special funds 2,781,912 2,781,912

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 82 of 147
Federal funds 24,448,223 24,098,939
Global Commitment fund 2,417,024 2,417,024
Interdepartmental transfers 462,127 462,127
Total 69,832,010 69,873,960
Sec. 23. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.317 is amended to read:
Sec. B.317 Department for children and families - family services
Personal services 45,197,694 45,286,553
Operating expenses 5,315,309 5,315,309
Grants 98,251,027 97,732,465
Total 148,764,030 148,334,327
Source of funds
General fund 58,838,741 59,984,059
Special funds 729,587 729,587
Federal funds 34,666,196 36,180,206
Global Commitment fund 54,514,506 51,425,475
Interdepartmental transfers 15,000 15,000
Total 148,764,030 148,334,327
Sec. 24. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.318 is amended to read:
Sec. B.318 Department for children and families - child development
Personal services 5,908,038 5,908,038
Operating expenses 813,321 813,321

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 83 of 147
Grants 223,329,336 211,815,836
Total 230,050,695 218,537,195
Source of funds
General fund 76,723,518 51,443,165
Special funds 96,312,000 109,512,000
Federal funds 43,511,414 42,902,383
Global Commitment fund 13,503,763 14,679,647
Total 230,050,695 218,537,195
Sec. 25. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.319 is amended to read:
Sec. B.319 Department for children and families - office of child support
Personal services 13,157,660 13,061,794
Operating expenses 3,759,992 3,759,992
Total 16,917,652 16,821,786
Source of funds
General fund 5,200,064 5,163,429
Special funds 455,719 455,719
Federal funds 10,874,269 10,815,038
Interdepartmental transfers 387,600 387,600
Total 16,917,652 16,821,786
Sec. 26. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.320 is amended to read:
Sec. B.320 Department for children and families - aid to aged, blind and

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 84 of 147
disabled
Personal services 2,252,206 2,481,741
Grants 10,717,444 10,369,155
Total 12,969,650 12,850,896
Source of funds
General fund 7,376,133 7,368,843
Global Commitment fund 5,593,517 5,482,053
Total 12,969,650 12,850,896
Sec. 27. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.321 is amended to read:
Sec. B.321 Department for children and families - general assistance
Personal services 15,000 15,000
Grants 11,054,252 10,702,625
Total 11,069,252 10,717,625
Source of funds
General fund 10,811,345 10,486,987
Federal funds 11,320 11,070
Global Commitment fund 246,587 219,568
Total 11,069,252 10,717,625
Sec. 28. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.322 is amended to read:
Sec. B.322 Department for children and families - 3SquaresVT
Grants 44,377,812 45,677,812

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 85 of 147
Total 44,377,812 45,677,812
Source of funds
Federal funds 44,377,812 45,677,812
Total 44,377,812 45,677,812
Sec. 29. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.323 is amended to read:
Sec. B.323 Department for children and families - reach up
Operating expenses 23,821 23,821
Grants 37,230,488 36,730,493
Total 37,254,309 36,754,314
Source of funds
General fund 24,733,042 24,233,047
Special funds 5,970,229 5,970,229
Federal funds 2,806,330 2,806,330
Global Commitment fund 3,744,708 3,744,708
Total 37,254,309 36,754,314
Sec. 30. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.325 is amended to read:
Sec. B.325 Department for children and families - office of economic
opportunity
Personal services 817,029 1,042,639
Operating expenses 100,407 100,407
Grants 35,466,283 35,812,536

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 86 of 147
Total 36,383,719 36,955,582
Source of funds
General fund 28,178,010 28,687,068
Special funds 83,135 83,135
Federal funds 4,935,273 4,998,078
Global Commitment fund 3,187,301 3,187,301
Total 36,383,719 36,955,582
Sec. 31. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.329 is amended to read:
Sec. B.329 Disabilities, aging, and independent living - administration &
support
Personal services 45,217,977 46,217,977
Operating expenses 6,472,558 6,714,680
Total 51,690,535 52,932,657
Source of funds
General fund 22,916,281 24,037,342
Special funds 1,390,457 1,390,457
Federal funds 26,063,097 26,184,158
Global Commitment fund 35,000 35,000
Interdepartmental transfers 1,285,700 1,285,700
Total 51,690,535 52,932,657

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 87 of 147
Sec. 32. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.330 is amended to read:
Sec. B.330 Disabilities, aging, and independent living - advocacy and
independent living grants
Grants 24,571,060 24,781,798
Total 24,571,060 24,781,798
Source of funds
General fund 8,392,303 8,504,605
Federal funds 7,321,114 7,321,114
Global Commitment fund 8,857,643 8,956,079
Total 24,571,060 24,781,798
Sec. 33. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.332 is amended to read:
Sec. B.332 Disabilities, aging, and independent living - vocational
rehabilitation
Grants 10,179,845 9,179,845
Total 10,179,845 9,179,845
Source of funds
General fund 1,371,845 371,845
Federal funds 7,558,000 7,558,000
Interdepartmental transfers 1,250,000 1,250,000
Total 10,179,845 9,179,845

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 88 of 147
Sec. 34. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.333 is amended to read:
Sec. B.333 Disabilities, aging, and independent living - developmental
services
Grants 329,299,344 331,262,271
Total 329,299,344 331,262,271
Source of funds
General fund 132,732 132,732
Special funds 15,463 15,463
Federal funds 403,573 403,573
Global Commitment fund 328,697,576 330,660,503
Interdepartmental transfers 50,000 50,000
Total 329,299,344 331,262,271
Sec. 35. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.334 is amended to read:
Sec. B.334 Disabilities, aging, and independent living - TBI home and
community based waiver
Grants 6,845,005 6,864,520
Total 6,845,005 6,864,520
Source of funds
Global Commitment fund 6,845,005 6,864,520
Total 6,845,005 6,864,520

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 89 of 147
Sec. 36. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.334.1 is amended to read:
Sec. B.334.1 Disabilities, aging and independent living - Long Term Care
Grants 293,584,545 347,376,122
Total 293,584,545 347,376,122
Source of funds
General fund 498,579 498,579
Federal funds 2,450,000 2,450,000
Global Commitment fund 290,635,966 344,427,543
Total 293,584,545 347,376,122
Sec. 37. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.338 is amended to read:
Sec. B.338 Corrections - correctional services
Personal services 147,472,104 148,472,104
Operating expenses 24,914,205 25,249,795
Total 172,386,309 173,721,899
Source of funds
General fund 162,807,888 163,643,478
Special funds 935,963 935,963
ARPA State Fiscal 5,000,000 5,000,000
Federal funds 499,888 999,888
Global Commitment fund 2,746,255 2,746,255
Interdepartmental transfers 396,315 396,315

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 90 of 147
Total 172,386,309 173,721,899
Sec. 38. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.342 is amended to read:
Sec. B.342 Vermont veterans’ home - care and support services
Personal services 17,631,222 17,595,290
Operating expenses 5,013,462 13,247,462
Grants 0 1,583,157
Total 22,644,684 32,425,909
Source of funds
General fund 4,320,687 11,224,018
Special funds 10,051,903 12,450,095
Federal funds 8,272,094 8,751,796
Total 22,644,684 32,425,909
Sec. 39. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.347 is amended to read:
Sec. B.347 Total human services
Source of funds
General fund 1,328,118,8061,364,156,647
Special funds 202,800,452 218,398,644
Tobacco fund 23,088,208 23,088,208
State health care resources fund 28,053,557 28,053,557
ARPA State Fiscal 5,000,000 5,000,000
Federal funds 1,803,398,9221,882,012,745

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 91 of 147
Global Commitment fund 1,980,839,5532,108,560,133
Internal service funds 490,853 490,853
Interdepartmental transfers 32,893,535 34,367,341
Permanent trust funds 25,000 25,000
Total 5,404,708,8865,664,153,128
Sec. 40. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.501 is amended to read:
Sec. B.501 Education - education services
Personal services 28,237,700 28,312,700
Operating expenses 1,134,912 1,134,912
Grants 322,345,763 322,345,763
Total 351,718,375 351,793,375
Source of funds
General fund 6,387,955 6,462,955
Special funds 3,033,144 3,033,144
Tobacco fund 750,388 750,388
Federal funds 340,584,414 340,584,414
Interdepartmental transfers 962,474 962,474
Total 351,718,375 351,793,375
Sec. 41. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.503 is amended to read:
Sec. B.503 Education - state-placed students
Grants 20,000,000 19,000,000

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 92 of 147
Total 20,000,000 19,000,000
Source of funds
Education fund 20,000,000 19,000,000
Total 20,000,000 19,000,000
Sec. 42. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.504 is amended to read:
Sec. B.504 Education - adult education and literacy
Grants 4,694,183 4,997,820
Total 4,694,183 4,997,820
Source of funds
General fund 3,778,133 4,081,770
Federal funds 916,050 916,050
Total 4,694,183 4,997,820
Sec. 43. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.504.1 is amended to read:
Sec. B.504.1 Education - Flexible Pathways
Grants 11,361,755 11,564,179
Total 11,361,755 11,564,179
Source of funds
General fund 921,500 921,500
Education fund 10,440,255 10,642,679
Total 11,361,755 11,564,179

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 93 of 147
Sec. 44. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.505 is amended to read:
Sec. B.505 Education - adjusted education payment
Grants 1,893,267,3941,882,267,394
Total 1,893,267,3941,882,267,394
Source of funds
Education fund 1,893,267,3941,882,267,394
Total 1,893,267,3941,882,267,394
Sec. 45. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.508 is amended to read:
Sec. B.508 Education - nutrition
Grants 20,400,000 17,500,000
Total 20,400,000 17,500,000
Source of funds
Education fund 20,400,000 17,500,000
Total 20,400,000 17,500,000
Sec. 46. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.516 is amended to read:
Sec. B.516 Total general education
Source of funds
General fund 228,890,519 229,269,156
Special funds 23,651,687 23,651,687
Tobacco fund 750,388 750,388
Education fund 2,323,283,2422,308,585,666

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 94 of 147
Federal funds 354,654,849 354,654,849
Global Commitment fund 260,000 260,000
Interdepartmental transfers 1,467,771 1,467,771
Pension trust funds 3,572,780 3,572,780
Total 2,936,531,2362,922,212,297
Sec. 47. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.704 is amended to read:
Sec. B.704 Forests, parks and recreation - forestry
Personal services 7,880,566 7,913,766
Operating expenses 1,005,046 1,005,046
Grants 1,712,423 1,713,923
Total 10,598,035 10,632,735
Source of funds
General fund 6,299,512 6,334,212
Special funds 547,215 547,215
Federal funds 3,394,931 3,394,931
Interdepartmental transfers 356,377 356,377
Total 10,598,035 10,632,735
Sec. 48. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.710 is amended to read:
Sec. B.710 Environmental conservation - air and waste management
Personal services 27,995,328 27,995,328
Operating expenses 10,788,954 10,816,954

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 95 of 147
Grants 4,943,000 4,943,000
Total 43,727,282 43,755,282
Source of funds
General fund 199,372 227,372
Special funds 24,643,580 24,643,580
Federal funds 18,800,064 18,800,064
Interdepartmental transfers 84,266 84,266
Total 43,727,282 43,755,282
Sec. 49. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.711 is amended to read:
Sec. B.711 Environmental conservation - office of water programs
Personal services 50,153,806 50,153,806
Operating expenses 8,362,915 8,370,915
Grants 92,365,140 92,365,140
Total 150,881,861 150,889,861
Source of funds
General fund 11,887,629 11,895,629
Special funds 30,967,150 30,967,150
Federal funds 107,154,542 107,154,542
Interdepartmental transfers 872,540 872,540
Total 150,881,861 150,889,861

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 96 of 147
Sec. 50. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.714 is amended to read:
Sec. B.714 Total natural resources
Source of funds
General fund 42,792,800 42,863,500
Special funds 81,275,829 81,275,829
Fish and wildlife fund 10,418,331 10,418,331
Federal funds 152,068,301 152,068,301
Interdepartmental transfers 14,131,324 14,131,324
Total 300,686,585 300,757,285
Sec. 51. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.1100 is amended to read:
Sec. B.1100 MISCELLANEOUS FISCAL YEAR 2025 ONE-TIME
APPROPRIATIONS
* * *
(d) Department of Health. In fiscal year 2025, funds are appropriated for
the following:
* * *
(8) $835,073 General Fund for the Bridges to Health Program; and
(9) $400,000 $550,000 General Fund for the Vermont Household
Health Insurance Survey; and
(10) $500,000 General Fund for community grants related to health
equity.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 97 of 147
(e) Department for Children and Families. In fiscal year 2025, funds are
appropriated for the following:
(1) $16,500,000 $18,340,304 General Fund for the General Assistance
Emergency Housing program;
(2) $1,034,065 General Fund to extend 10 Economic Services Division
limited service positions, including associated operating costs, in support of
the General Assistance Emergency Housing program; and
(3) $332,000 General Fund for a 2-1-1 service line contract to operate
24 hours seven days per week;
(4) $340,000 General Fund and $660,000 federal funds for the Office of
Child Support mainframe transition planning. Notwithstanding 32 V.S.A.
§ 703, unless otherwise reverted by a future act of the General Assembly, these
appropriations shall carry forward until fully expended; and
(5) $1,800,000 General Fund shall be added to the appropriation made
in Sec. B.1102(b)(4) of this act for the Comprehensive Child Welfare
Information System.
* * *
(n) Agency of Human Services Secretary’s Office. In fiscal year 2025,
funds are appropriated for the following:
(1) $3,913,200 $5,586,324 General Fund and $5,366,383 $7,713,259
federal funds to be used for Global Commitment match for the Medicaid

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 98 of 147
Global Payment Program. To the extent that at a future date the Global
Payment Program ceases to operate as a program or changes methodology to
a retrospective payment program, any resulting one-time General Fund
spending authority remaining at that time shall be reverted. If the Human
Services Caseload Reserve established in 32 V.S.A. § 308b has not been
replenished in accordance with subdivision (b)(21) of Sec. B.1102 of this act,
the remaining unallocated General Fund balance shall be reserved in the
Human Services Caseload Reserve established in 32 V.S.A. § 308b up to the
amount appropriated in this subdivision.
(o) Department of Vermont Health Access. In fiscal year 2025, funds are
appropriated for the following:
(1) $9,279,583 $13,299,583 Global Commitment for the Medicaid
Global Payment Program;
(2) $150,000 General Fund to conduct a technical analysis of Vermont’s
health insurance markets; and
(3) $100,000 General Fund to implement the expansion of Medicare
Savings Programs eligibility;
(4) $10,000,000 General Fund for Provider Stabilization Grants; and
(5) $11,000,000 General Fund for an alternative payment model
reconciliation payment to Brattleboro Retreat. All or a portion of these funds
may also be used as matching funds to the Agency of Human Services Global

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 99 of 147
Commitment Program to provide State match. If funds are used as matching
funds to the Agency of Human Services Global Commitment Program to
provide State match, the commensurate amount of Global Commitment Fund
spending authority may be requested during the Global Commitment Transfer
process pursuant to Sec. E.301.1 of this act.
* * *
(v) Agency of Administration. In fiscal year 2025, funds are appropriated
for the following:
(1) $200,000 General Fund for local economic damage grants to
municipalities that were impacted by the August and December 2023 flooding
events in counties that are eligible for Federal Emergency Management
Agency Public Assistance funds under federal disaster declarations DR-4744-
VT and DR-4762-VT. It is the intent of the General Assembly that these local
economic damage grants be distributed to municipalities throughout the State
to address the secondary economic impacts of the August and December 2023
flooding events. Monies from these grants shall not be expended on Federal
Emergency Management Agency related projects
$1,800,000 General Fund for local economic damage grants to
municipalities in counties that are eligible for Federal Emergency
Management Agency (FEMA) Public Assistance funds under federal disaster
declarations DR-4810-VT and DR-4744-VT. It is the intent of the General

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 100 of 147
Assembly that these local economic damage grants be distributed to
municipalities throughout the State to address the secondary economic impacts
of 2023 and 2024 flooding events. Monies from these grants shall not be
expended on FEMA-related projects.
(A) The funds appropriated in this subdivision (v)(1) for local
economic damage grants shall be distributed as follows:
(i) $75,000 to each municipality that as of June 1, 2025 has at
least $5,000,000 in estimated reported damages to public infrastructure
relating to 2023 and 2024 flooding events.
(ii) $50,000 to each municipality that as of June 1, 2025 has less
than $5,000,000 and at least $2,000,000 in estimated reported damages to
public infrastructure relating to 2023 and 2024 flooding events.
(iii) $30,000 to each municipality that as of June 1, 2025 has less
than $2,000,000 and at least $1,000,000 in estimated reported damages to
public infrastructure relating to 2023 and 2024 flooding events.
(iv) $20,000 to each municipality that as of June 1, 2025 has less
than $1,000,000 and at least $250,000 in estimated reported damages to
public infrastructure relating to 2023 and 2024 flooding events.
(v) $10,000 to each municipality that as of June 1, 2025 has less
than $250,000 and at least $100,000 in estimated reported damages to public
infrastructure relating to 2023 and 2024 flooding events.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 101 of 147
(B) To the extent that the funds appropriated in this subdivision (v)(1)
have not been granted on or before June 30, 2025, they shall revert to the
General Fund and be transferred to the Emergency Relief and Assistance
Fund.
(C) To the extent that the funds appropriated in this subdivision
(v)(1) are insufficient to distribute grants to all eligible municipalities in their
full amount, the Commissioner of Finance and Management shall, pursuant to
32 V.S.A. § 511, utilize excess receipt authority to expend funds from the
PILOT Special Fund for this purpose.
(w) Vermont Housing and Conservation Board. In fiscal year 2025, funds
are appropriated for the following:
(1) $8,600,000 General Fund to provide support and enhance capacity
for the production and preservation of: affordable mixed-income rental
housing and homeownership units including improvements to manufactured
homes and communities; permanent homes and emergency shelter for those
experiencing homelessness; recovery residences; and housing available to
farm workers, refugees, and individuals who are eligible to receive Medicaid-
funded home- and community-based services; and
(2) $2,800,000 General Fund to complete pilot projects identified
pursuant to 2022 Acts and Resolves No. 186.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 102 of 147
Sec. 52. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. D.100 is amended to read:
Sec. D.100 ALLOCATIONS; PROPERTY TRANSFER TAX
(a) This act contains the following amounts allocated to special funds that
receive revenue from the property transfer tax. These allocations shall not
exceed available revenues.
(1) The sum of $575,662 is allocated from the Current Use
Administration Special Fund to the Department of Taxes for administration of
the Use Tax Reimbursement Program. Notwithstanding 32 V.S.A. § 9610(c),
amounts in excess of $575,662 from the property transfer tax deposited into the
Current Use Administration Special Fund shall be transferred into the General
Fund.
(2) Notwithstanding 10 V.S.A. § 312, amounts in excess of $22,106,740
$28,238,050 from the property transfer tax and surcharge established in
32 V.S.A. § 9602a deposited into the Vermont Housing and Conservation Trust
Fund shall be transferred into the General Fund.
(A) The dedication of $2,500,000 in revenue from the property
transfer tax pursuant to 32 V.S.A. § 9610(d) for the debt payments on the
affordable housing bond pursuant to 10 V.S.A. § 314 shall be offset by the
reduction of $1,500,000 in the appropriation to the Vermont Housing and
Conservation Board and $1,000,000 from the surcharge established in
32 V.S.A. § 9602a. The fiscal year 2025 appropriation of $22,106,740

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 103 of 147
$28,238,050 to the Vermont Housing and Conservation Board reflects the
$1,500,000 reduction. The affordable housing bond and related property
transfer tax and surcharge provisions are repealed after the life of the bond on
July 1, 2039. Once the bond is retired, the $1,500,000 reduction in the
appropriation to the Vermont Housing and Conservation Board shall be
restored.
(3) Notwithstanding 24 V.S.A. § 4306(a), amounts in excess of
$7,772,373 $9,052,113 from the property transfer tax deposited into the
Municipal and Regional Planning Fund shall be transferred into the General
Fund. The $7,772,373 $9,052,113 shall be allocated as follows:
(A) $6,404,540 $7,300,358 for disbursement to regional planning
commissions in a manner consistent with 24 V.S.A. § 4306(b);
(B) $931,773 $1,187,721 for disbursement to municipalities in a
manner consistent with 24 V.S.A. § 4306(b); and
(C) $436,060 $564,034 to the Agency of Digital Services for the
Vermont Center for Geographic Information.
Sec. 53. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. D.101 is amended to read:
Sec. D.101 FUND TRANSFERS
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the following amounts are
transferred from the funds indicated:
(1) From the General Fund to the:

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 104 of 147
(A) General Obligation Bonds Debt Service Fund (#35100):
$73,212,880 $78,235,088.34.
* * *
(J) Emergency Relief and Assistance Fund (#21555): $830,000
$6,500,000.
(K) Education Fund (#20205): $25,000,000.
(L) Medical Insurance Fund (#55100): $18,500,000.
(M) Correctional Industries Fund (#59100): $3,135,443.
(N) Act 250 Permit Fund (#21260): $900,000.
(O) State Liability Self-Insurance Fund (#56200): $3,000,000.
(P) Emergency Personnel Survivor’s Benefit Fund (#21884):
$220,000.
(Q) Other Infrastructure, Essential Investments, and Reserves Fund
(#21953): $133,700,000.
(2) From the Transportation Fund to the:
(A) Vermont Recreational Trails Fund (#21455): $370,000.
(B) Downtown Transportation and Related Capital Improvements
Fund (#21575): $523,966.
(C)(B) General Obligation Bonds Debt Service Fund (#35100):
$316,745.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 105 of 147
(D)(C) Notwithstanding 19 V.S.A. § 13(c), the Transportation Fund
transfer to the Central Garage fund in fiscal year 2025 shall be $0.
* * *
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, in fiscal year
2025:
(1) The following amounts shall be transferred to the General Fund
from the funds indicated:
(A) Cannabis Regulation Fund (#21998): $12,000,000
$15,417,084.32.
(B) AHS Central Office Earned Federal Receipts (#22005):
$4,641,960.
(C) Sports Wagering Enterprise Fund (#50250): $7,000,000
$6,139,162.
(D) Liquor Control Fund (#50300): $21,100,000 $9,543,353.
(E) Tobacco Litigation Settlement Fund (#21370): $3,000,000.
(F) Financial Institutions Supervision Fund (#21065): $1,100,000.
(F) Workforce Education and Training Fund (#21913):
$2,598,921.75.
(G) Vermont Traumatic Brain Injury Fund (#21994): the balance of
the fund at the close of fiscal year 2025.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 106 of 147
(2) The following estimated amounts, which may be all or a portion of
unencumbered fund balances, shall be transferred from the following funds to
the General Fund. The Commissioner of Finance and Management shall
report to the Joint Fiscal Committee at its July meeting the final amounts
transferred from each fund and certify that such transfers will not impair the
agency, office, or department reliant upon each fund from meeting its statutory
requirements.
(A) AG-Fees & Reimbursements-Court Order Fund (#21638):
$2,000,000.
(B) Unclaimed Property Fund (#62100): $6,500,000 $10,995,595.
(3) $66,935,000 $63,560,450.50 of the net unencumbered fund balances
in the Insurance Regulatory and Supervision Fund (#21075), the Captive
Insurance Regulatory and Supervision Fund (#21085), and the Securities
Regulatory and Supervision Fund (#21080) shall be transferred to the General
Fund.
(c)(1) Notwithstanding Sec. 1.4.3 of the Rules for State Matching Funds
under the Federal Public Assistance Program, in fiscal year 2025, the
Secretary of Administration may provide funding from the Emergency Relief
and Assistance Fund that was transferred pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(J) of
this section to subgrantees prior to the completion of a project. In fiscal year
years 2025 and 2026, up to 70 percent of the State funding match on the

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 107 of 147
nonfederal share of an approved project for municipalities that were impacted
by the August and December 2023 and 2024 flooding events in counties that
are eligible for Federal Emergency Management Agency Public Assistance
funds under federal disaster declarations DR-4744-VT and, DR-4762-VT, DR-
4810-VT, DR-4816-VT, and DR-4826-VT may be advanced at the request of a
municipality.
(2) Notwithstanding Sec. 1.4.1 of the Rules for State Matching Funds
Under the Federal Public Assistance Program, the Secretary of Administration
shall increase the standard State funding match on the nonfederal share of an
approved project to the highest percentage possible given available funding for
municipalities in counties that were impacted by the August and December
2023 and 2024 flooding events and are eligible for Federal Emergency
Management Agency Public Assistance funds under federal disaster
declarations DR-4744-VT and, DR-4762-VT, DR-4810-VT, DR-4816-VT, and
DR-4826-VT.
Sec. 54. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. D.102 is amended to read:
Sec. D.102 REVERSIONS
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, in fiscal year
2025, the following amounts shall revert to the General Fund from the
accounts indicated:
* * *

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 108 of 147
3150892104 MH – Case Management Serv $350,000.00 $350,199.34
* * *
1100892208 AOA – VT Housing Finance Agency $3,000,000.00
1100892403 AOA – Health Equity Community Grants $500,000.00
1120020000 Tuition Assistance Program $133,877.86
1120892401 DHR – New Position in DHR Ops $477,769.00
1120892402 DHR – New Position in VTHR Ops $40,726.07
1140010000 Tax Operation Costs $1,267,062.22
1140060000 Reappraisal and Listing Payments $35,270.75
1140070000 Use Tax Reimbursement Program $37,864.25
1140330000 Renter Rebates $2,186,940.33
1140892403 Tax – Child Care Contr Positions $3,591,823.02
1260892201 TRE – Bond Redemption $2,000,000.00
1260980000 Debt Service $235,445.15
1266892401 VPIC – Pension System Assets $5,000.00
2100892201 AG – Racial Disparities $48,465.00
2130400000 SIUS Parent Account $395,749.64
2150010000 Mil Admin/TAGO $142,789.80
2150050000 Mil Vet Affairs Office $100,000.00
2160892201 CCVS – VT Forensic Nursing $246.43
2160892304 CCVS – Kurn Hattin Survivor $250.00

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 109 of 147
2200010000 Administration Division $167,222.00
3310000000 Commission on Women $25,390.43
3330892401 GMCB – VHCURES Database Implemen $545,782.90
3400892111 Supp New Americans Refugee $23,431.00
3400892301 AHSCO – Refugee Resettlement $1,293.00
3420892405 HD – Regional Emergency Med $8,295.01
3440050000 DCFS – AABD $35,310.73
3440892110 DCF – Grants to Reachup $5.10
3440892203 DCF – Parent Child Ctrs Cap Imp $20,708.22
3440892214 DCF – Child Care Provider Workfor $294.79
4100500000 VT Department of Labor $8,000,000.00
5100070000 Education Services $100,000.00
5100892101 AOE – VSC Committee Per Diem $16,295.33
5100892102 AOA – Advisory Group Per Diem $9,018.00
5100892103 AOE – ESESAG Per Diems $8,960.00
5100892201 AOE – Comm Pub Sch Emp Hlth Ben $29,050.00
5100892202 AOE – Task Force Equit Inclusive $6,150.00
5100892302 AOE – Ethnic&Social Equity Per D $14,386.24
6100010000 Administration Management and Planning $402,052.99
6100040000 Property Tax Assessment Approp $11,692.11
6140880005 152/00 State Asst Munic Poll Cont $126.26

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 110 of 147
7100892301 Everyone Eats $144,565.43
7120892304 DED – Relocated and Remote Worker $127,314.33
8100002100 Department of Motor Vehicles $2,482.81
* * *
(c) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, in fiscal year
2025, the following amounts shall revert to the Education Fund from the
accounts indicated:
5100010000 Administration $301,041.03
5100050000 State-Placed Students $13,687,528.41
5100090000 Education Grant $359,570.31
5100110000 Small School Grant $593,700.00
5100200000 Education – Technical Education $1,802,347.44
5100210000 Education – Flexible Pathways $1,312,334.72
5100892405 AOE – Universal School Meals $6,201,479.69
Sec. 55. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. D.103 is amended to read:
Sec. D.103 RESERVES
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, in fiscal year
2025, the following reserve transactions shall be implemented for the funds
provided:
(1) General Fund.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 111 of 147
(A) Pursuant to 32 V.S.A. § 308, an estimated amount of $15,168,663
$15,168,660.85 shall be added to the General Fund Budget Stabilization
Reserve.
(B) $5,480,000 shall be added to the 27/53 reserve in fiscal year
2025. This action is the fiscal year 2025 contribution to the reserve for the
53rd week of Medicaid as required by 32 V.S.A. § 308e and the 27th payroll
reserve as required by 32 V.S.A. § 308e.
(C) Notwithstanding 32 V.S.A. § 308b, $3,913,200 shall be
unreserved from the Human Services Caseload Reserve established within the
General Fund in 32 V.S.A. § 308b.
* * *
Sec. 56. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. E.100 is amended to read:
Sec. E.100 POSITIONS
(a) The establishment of 43 47 permanent positions is authorized in fiscal
year 2025 for the following:
(1) Permanent classified positions:
* * *
(H) Office of the Attorney General:
(i) one Court Diversion Assistant Director.
* * *
(2) Permanent exempt positions:

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 112 of 147
* * *
(G) Human Rights Commission:
(i) one Intake Specialist; and
(ii) one Staff Attorney Investigator.
(H) Office of the Attorney General:
(i) one Assistant Attorney General.
* * *
(d) The conversion of eight limited service positions to exempt permanent
status is authorized in fiscal year 2025 as follows:
(1) Office of the Defender General:
(A) one Administrative Services Tech;
(B) two DG IT Specialist II’s;
(C) one ODG Legal Assistant I;
(D) two Staff Attorney I’s;
(E) one Financial Specialist III; and
(F) one Admin Secretary.
* * *
Sec. 57. 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 78, Sec. E.100, as amended by 2024 Acts
and Resolves No. 87, Sec. 56, is further amended to read:
Sec. E.100 EXECUTIVE BRANCH POSITIONS

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 113 of 147
(a) The establishment of 75 permanent positions is authorized in fiscal year
2024 for the following:
* * *
(2) Permanent exempt positions:
* * *
(F) Office of the State Treasurer:
(i) one Director – VT Saves Economic Empowerment Division;
and
(ii) one Communications and Outreach Manager – VT Saves
Economic Empowerment Division;
* * *
Sec. 58. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. E.301 is amended to read:
Sec. E.301 SECRETARY’S OFFICE; GLOBAL COMMITMENT
* * *
(b) In addition to the State funds appropriated in Sec. B.301 of this act, a
total estimated sum of $24,301,185 $28,307,335 is anticipated to be certified
as State matching funds under Global Commitment as follows:
(1) $21,295,850 $25,302,000 certified State match available from local
education agencies for eligible special education school-based Medicaid
services under Global Commitment. This amount, combined with $29,204,150
$34,698,000 of federal funds appropriated in Sec. B.301 of this act, equals a

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 114 of 147
total estimated expenditure of $50,500,000 $60,000,000. An amount equal to
the amount of the federal matching funds for eligible special education school-
based Medicaid services under Global Commitment shall be transferred from
the Global Commitment Fund to the Medicaid Reimbursement Special Fund
created in 16 V.S.A. § 2959a.
(2) $3,005,335 certified State match available from local designated
mental health and developmental services agencies for eligible mental health
services provided under Global Commitment.
(c) Up to $4,487,210 $3,614,245 is transferred from the Agency of Human
Services Federal Receipts Holding Account to the Interdepartmental Transfer
Fund consistent with the amount appropriated in Sec. B.301 of this act.
Sec. 59. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. G.109 is amended to read:
Sec. G.109 PAY ACT APPROPRIATIONS; FISCAL YEARS 2025 AND
2026
(a) Executive Branch. The first and second years of the two-year
agreements between the State of Vermont and the Vermont State Employees’
Association for the Defender General, Non-Management, Supervisory, and
Corrections bargaining units, and, for the purpose of appropriation, the State’s
Attorneys’ offices bargaining unit, for the period of July 1, 2024 through June
30, 2026; the collective bargaining agreement with the Vermont Troopers’
Association for the period of July 1, 2024 through June 30, 2026; and salary

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 115 of 147
increases for employees in the Executive Branch not covered by the bargaining
agreements shall be funded as follows:
(1) Fiscal year 2025.
* * *
(D) Transfers. With due regard to the possible availability of other
funds, for fiscal year 2025, the Secretary of Administration may transfer from
the various appropriations and various funds and from the receipts of the
Liquor Control Board Fund such sums as the Secretary may determine to be
necessary to carry out the purposes of this act to the various agencies
supported by State funds.
* * *
(2) Fiscal year 2026.
* * *
(D) Transfers. With due regard to the possible availability of other
funds, for fiscal year 2026, the Secretary of Administration may transfer from
the various appropriations and various funds and from the receipts of the
Liquor Control Board Fund such sums as the Secretary may determine to be
necessary to carry out the purposes of this act to the various agencies
supported by State funds.
* * *
Sec. 60. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 145, Sec. 7 is amended to read:

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 116 of 147
Sec. 7. TELEPHONE TAX; REPEAL; TRANSITION
(a) 32 V.S.A. § 8521 (telephone personal property tax) is repealed on July
1, 2025 2026. The final monthly installment payment of the telephone
personal property tax under 32 V.S.A. § 8521 levied on the net book value of
the taxpayer’s personal property as of December 31, 2024 2025 shall be due
on or before July 25, 2025 2026.
(b) 32 V.S.A. § 8522 (alternative telephone gross revenues tax) is repealed
on January 1, 2026 2027. The final quarterly payment of the alternative tax
under 32 V.S.A. § 8522 shall be due on or before January 25, 2026 2027.
(c) Any taxpayer who paid the alternative tax imposed by 32 V.S.A. § 8522
prior to the repeal of the tax on January 1, 2026 2027 shall become subject to
the income tax imposed under 32 V.S.A. chapter 151 beginning with the
taxpayer’s first income tax year starting on or after January 1, 2025 2026. No
alternative tax under 32 V.S.A. § 8522 shall be due for any period included in
the taxpayer’s income tax filing for tax years starting on or after January 1,
2025 2026.
(d) In fiscal year 2025 2026, the Division of Property Valuation and
Review of the Department of Taxes and all communications service providers
with taxable communications property in Vermont shall be subject to the
inventory and valuation provisions prescribed in 32 V.S.A. § 4452, as
applicable.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 117 of 147
Sec. 61. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 145, Sec. 15 is amended to read:
Sec. 15. EFFECTIVE DATES
This act shall take effect on passage, except that:
* * *
(3) Secs. 8–12 (communications property tax) shall take effect on July 1,
2025 2026 and shall apply to grand lists lodged on or after April 1, 2025
2026.
Sec. 62. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 166, Sec. 15 is amended to read:
Sec. 15. TRANSFER AND APPROPRIATION
Notwithstanding 7 V.S.A. § 845(c), in fiscal year 2025:
(1) $500,000.00 is transferred from the Cannabis Regulation Fund
established pursuant to 7 V.S.A. § 845 to the Cannabis Business Development
Fund established pursuant to 7 V.S.A. § 987; and
(2) $500,000.00 is appropriated from the Cannabis Business 19
Development Fund to the Agency of Commerce and Community Development
Department of Economic Development to fund technical assistance and
provide loans and grants pursuant to 7 V.S.A. § 987.
Sec. 63. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 181, Sec. 78 is amended to read:
Sec. 78. TRANSFERS; PROPERTY TRANSFER TAX
Notwithstanding 10 V.S.A. § 312, 24 V.S.A. § 4306(a), 32 V.S.A. § 9610(c),
or any other provision of law to the contrary, amounts in excess of

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 118 of 147
$32,954,775.00 from the property transfer tax shall be transferred into the
General Fund. Of this amount:
(1) $6,106,335.00 shall be transferred from the General Fund into the
Vermont Housing and Conservation Trust Fund.
(2) $1,279,740.00 shall be transferred from the General Fund into the
Municipal and Regional Planning Fund. [Repealed.]
Sec. 64. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 181, Sec. 96 is amended to read:
Sec. 96. APPROPRIATION; RENT ARREARS ASSISTANCE FUND
The sum of $2,500,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Vermont State Housing Authority Department of Housing and Community
Development in fiscal year 2025 for the Rent Arrears Assistance Fund
established by 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 47, Sec. 45.
Sec. 65. 2022 Acts and Resolves No. 182, Sec. 3, as amended by 2023 Acts
and Resolves No. 3, Sec. 75, 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 78, Sec. C.119, and
2024 Acts and Resolves No. 181, Sec. 106, is further amended to read:
Sec. 3. MANUFACTURED HOME IMPROVEMENT AND
REPAIR PROGRAM
(a) Amounts Of the amounts available from the American Rescue Plan Act
– State Fiscal Recovery funds, $4,000,000 is appropriated to the Department
of Housing and Community Development for the Manufactured Home

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 119 of 147
Improvement and Repair Program and shall be used for one or more of the
following purposes:
* * *
Sec. 66. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 181, Sec. 113b is amended to read:
Sec. 113b. APPROPRIATION; NATURAL RESOURCES LAND USE
REVIEW BOARD
The sum of $1,300,000.00 $400,000 is appropriated from the General Fund
to the Natural Resources Land Use Review Board in fiscal year 2025.
Sec. 67. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 183, Sec. 24a is amended to read:
Sec. 24a. COMPENSATION FOR OVERPAYMENT
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the sum of
$29,224.00 a $29,224 credit shall be transferred from the Education Fund to
the Town of applied to the Canaan Town School District’s education spending,
as defined per 16 V.S.A. § 4001(6), in fiscal year 2025 to compensate the
homestead taxpayers of the Town of Canaan Town School District for an
overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024 due to erroneous
accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating average daily
membership. The transfer under this subsection shall be made directly to the
Town of Canaan.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the sum of
$5,924.00 shall be transferred from the Education Fund to the Town of

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 120 of 147
Bloomfield in fiscal year 2025 to compensate the homestead taxpayers of the
Town of Bloomfield for an overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024
due to erroneous accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating
average daily membership. The transfer under this subsection shall be made
directly to the Town of Bloomfield.
(c) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the sum of
$2,575.00 shall be transferred from the Education Fund to the Town of
Brunswick in fiscal year 2025 to compensate the homestead taxpayers of the
Town of Brunswick for an overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024
due to erroneous accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating
average daily membership. The transfer under this subsection shall be made
directly to the Town of Brunswick.
(d) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the sum of
$6,145.00 shall be transferred from the Education Fund to the Town of East
Haven in fiscal year 2025 to compensate the homestead taxpayers of the Town
of East Haven for an overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024 due to
erroneous accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating
average daily membership. The transfer under this subsection shall be made
directly to the Town of East Haven.
(e) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the sum of
$2,046.00 shall be transferred from the Education Fund to the Town of Granby

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 121 of 147
in fiscal year 2025 to compensate the homestead taxpayers of the Town of
Granby for an overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024 due to
erroneous accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating
average daily membership. The transfer under this subsection shall be made
directly to the Town of Granby.
(f) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the sum of
$10,034.00 shall be transferred from the Education Fund to the Town of
Guildhall in fiscal year 2025 to compensate the homestead taxpayers of the
Town of Guildhall for an overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024
due to erroneous accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating
average daily membership. The transfer under this subsection shall be made
directly to the Town of Guildhall.
(g) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the sum of
$20,536.00 shall be transferred from the Education Fund to the Town of Kirby
in fiscal year 2025 to compensate the homestead taxpayers of the Town of
Kirby for an overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024 due to
erroneous accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating
average daily membership. The transfer under this subsection shall be made
directly to the Town of Kirby.
(h) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the sum of
$2,402.00 shall be transferred from the Education Fund to the Town of

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 122 of 147
Lemington in fiscal year 2025 to compensate the homestead taxpayers of the
Town of Lemington for an overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024
due to erroneous accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating
average daily membership. The transfer under this subsection shall be made
directly to the Town of Lemington.
(i) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the sum of
$11,464.00 shall be transferred from the Education Fund to the Town of
Maidstone in fiscal year 2025 to compensate the homestead taxpayers of the
Town of Maidstone for an overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024
due to erroneous accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating
average daily membership. The transfer under this subsection shall be made
directly to the Town of Maidstone.
(j) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the sum of
$4,349.00 shall be transferred from the Education Fund to the Town of Norton
in fiscal year 2025 to compensate the homestead taxpayers of the Town of
Norton for an overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024 due to
erroneous accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating
average daily membership. The transfer under this subsection shall be made
directly to the Town of Norton.
(k) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the sum of
$2,657.00 shall be transferred from the Education Fund to the Town of Victory

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 123 of 147
in fiscal year 2025 to compensate the homestead taxpayers of the Town of
Victory for an overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024 due to
erroneous accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating
average daily membership. The transfer under this subsection shall be made
directly to the Town of Victory.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a $68,132 credit shall
be applied to the Northeast Kingdom Choice School District’s education
spending, as defined per 16 V.S.A. § 4001(6), in fiscal year 2025 to
compensate the homestead taxpayers of the Northeast Kingdom Choice School
District for an overpayment of education taxes in fiscal year 2024 due to
erroneous accounting of certain students for the purposes of calculating
average daily membership.
Sec. 68. 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 78, Sec. B.1100, as amended by 2024
Acts and Resolves No. 87, Sec. 40 and 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec.
C.101, is further amended to read:
Sec. B.1100 MISCELLANEOUS FISCAL YEAR 2024 ONE-TIME
APPROPRIATIONS
(a) Agency of Administration. In fiscal year 2024, funds are appropriated
for the following:
(1) $2,300,000 General Fund to create, implement, and oversee a
comprehensive statewide language access plan;.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 124 of 147
(2) $15,000,000 General Fund to be used to offset the cost of denied
claims for Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA) federal
reimbursement related to presidentially declared disasters in fiscal year 2024
or 2025, or to fund unanticipated statewide costs related to recovery efforts
from declared disasters or administering programs created by funds from the
American Rescue Plan Act – State Fiscal Recovery Fund, including the costs
of related limited-service positions, and contracting for programs and services.
(3) $500,000 General Fund for community grants related to health
equity. These funds shall not be released until the recommendation and report
required by Sec. E.100.1 of this act, regarding the permanent administrative
location for the Office of Health Equity, is provided to the committees of
jurisdiction listed in Sec. E.100.1 of this act and the positions in the Office of
Health Equity created by this act are filled.
* * *
(l) Agency of Human Services Central Office. In fiscal year 2024, funds
are appropriated for the following:
* * *
(2) $8,834,000 General Fund and $11,483,302 Federal Revenue Fund
#22005 for a two-year pilot to expand the Blueprint for Health Hub and Spoke
program. Funds shall be used to expand the substances covered by the
program, include mental health and pediatric screenings, and make strategic

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 125 of 147
investments with community partners; unexpended appropriations shall carry
forward into subsequent fiscal years and remain available for this purpose;
* * *
(m) Department of Vermont Health Access. In fiscal year 2024, funds are
appropriated for the following:
(1) $366,066 General Fund and $372,048 Federal Revenue Fund
#22005 for a two-year pilot to expand the Blueprint for Health Hub and Spoke
program; unexpended appropriations shall carry forward into subsequent
fiscal years and remain available for this purpose;
(2) $15,583,352 Global Commitment Fund #20405 for a two-year pilot
to expand the Blueprint for Health Hub and Spoke program; unexpended
appropriations shall carry forward into subsequent fiscal years and remain
available for this purpose; and
* * *
(n) Department of Health. In fiscal year 2024, funds are appropriated for
the following:
(1) $4,595,448 Global Commitment Fund #20405 to the Division of
Substance Use Programs for a two-year pilot to expand the Blueprint for
Health Hub and Spoke program; unexpended appropriations shall carry
forward into subsequent fiscal years and remain available for this purpose;
* * *

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 126 of 147
(x) Judiciary. In fiscal year 2024, funds are appropriated for the
following:
(1)(A) $4,680,000 General Fund for the Judiciary network replacement
project.
(B) Judiciary shall update the Joint Information Technology
Oversight Committee on the status of this project on or before December 1,
2023.
(2) $300,000 General Fund for the Essex County Courthouse renovation
planning. Of this amount, $50,000 may be used to construct bathrooms
compliant with the Americans with Disabilities Act in the Essex Meeting
House.
* * *
(ee) Joint Fiscal Office. In fiscal year 2024, funds are appropriated for the
following:
(1) $250,000 for per diem compensation and reimbursement of expenses
for members of the Task Force on Economic Development Incentives and for
consulting services approved by the Task Force consulting services related to
legislative needs identified in the 2025-2026 biennium, including analysis of
legislative staff compensation and organizational structure and implementation
of adjustments in accordance with policies adopted by the Joint Legislative
Management Committee.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 127 of 147
* * *
Sec. 69. 2022 Acts and Resolves No. 185, Sec. B.1102, as added by 2023 Acts
and Resolves No. 3, Sec. 47, is amended to read:
Sec. B.1102 FISCAL YEAR 2023 ONE-TIME TECHNOLOGY
MODERNIZATION SPECIAL FUND APPROPRIATIONS
(a) In fiscal year 2023, funds are appropriated from the Technology
Modernization Special Fund (21951) for new and ongoing initiatives as
follows:
(1) $40,010,000 to the Agency of Digital Services to be used as follows:
(A) $11,800,000 for Enterprise Resource Planning (ERP) system
upgrade of Human Capital Management and core statewide financial
accounting system and integration with the Department of Labor and Agency
of Transportation financial systems;
* * *
Sec. 70. 3 V.S.A. § 3306 is amended to read:
§ 3306. TECHNOLOGY MODERNIZATION SPECIAL FUND
* * *
(b) Funds. The Fund shall consist of:
(1) any amounts transferred or appropriated to it by the General
Assembly; and
(2) any interest earned by the Fund.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 128 of 147
* * *
Sec. 71. WORKFORCE EDUCATION AND TRAINING FUND; REPEAL
(a) 10 V.S.A. § 543 (Workforce Education and Training Fund) is repealed.
Sec. 72. 18 V.S.A. § 9502 is amended to read:
§ 9502. TOBACCO TRUST FUND
(a)(1) The Tobacco Trust Fund is established in the Office of the State
Treasurer for the purposes of creating a self-sustaining, perpetual fund for
tobacco cessation and prevention that is not dependent upon tobacco sales
volume.
(2) The Trust Fund shall comprise be composed of:
(A) appropriations transfers made by the General Assembly; and
(B) transfers from the Litigation Settlement Fund pursuant to
subdivision (b) of this section; and
(C) contributions from any other source.
(3) The State Treasurer shall not disburse monies from the Trust Fund,
except upon appropriation by the General Assembly. In any fiscal year, total
appropriations from the Trust Fund shall not exceed seven percent of the fair
market value of the Fund at the end of the prior fiscal year.
(4) The Trust Fund shall be administered by the State Treasurer. The
Treasurer may invest monies in the Fund in accordance with the provisions of
32 V.S.A. § 434. All balances in the Fund at the end of the fiscal year shall be

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 129 of 147
carried forward. Interest earned shall remain in the Fund. The Treasurer’s
annual financial report to the Governor and the General Assembly shall
contain an accounting of receipts, disbursements, and earnings of the Fund.
(b) Unless otherwise authorized by the General Assembly on or before June
30, 2000, and on June 30 of each subsequent fiscal year, any unencumbered
balance in the Litigation Settlement Fund shall be transferred to the Trust
Fund. [Repealed.]
Sec. 73. 30 V.S.A. chapter 86 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 86. UNDERGROUND UTILITY DAMAGE PREVENTION
SYSTEM
* * *
§ 7006. MARKING OF UNDERGROUND UTILITY FACILITIES
A company notified in accordance with section 7005 of this title shall,
within 48 72 hours, exclusive of Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, of the
receipt of the notice, mark the approximate location of its underground utility
facilities in the area of the proposed excavation activities; provided, however,
if the company advises the person that the proposed excavation area is of such
length or size that the company cannot reasonably mark all of the underground
utility facilities within 48 72 hours, the person shall notify the company of the
specific locations in which the excavation activities will first occur and the
company shall mark facilities in those locations within 48 72 hours and the

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 130 of 147
remaining facilities within a reasonable time thereafter. A company and an
excavator may by agreement fix a later time for the company’s marking of the
facilities, provided the marking is made prior to excavation activities. For the
purposes of this chapter, the approximate location of underground facilities
shall be marked with stakes, paint, or other physical means as designated by
the Commission.
§ 7006a. MAINTENANCE OF UNDERGROUND UTILITY FACILITY
MARKINGS
After a company has marked its underground facilities in accordance with
section 7006 of this title, the excavator shall be responsible for maintenance of
the designated markings. In the event said markings are obliterated,
destroyed, or removed, the person engaged in excavation activities shall notify
the System referred to in section 7002 of this title that remarking is needed.
The System shall then notify all member companies whose facilities may be
affected. The company shall within 48 72 hours, exclusive of Saturdays,
Sundays, and legal holidays, following receipt of the notice, remark the
location of its underground utility facilities.
* * *
Sec. 74. 32 V.S.A. § 5 is amended to read:
§ 5. ACCEPTANCE OF GRANTS
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 131 of 147
(1) “Loan” means a loan that is interest free or below market value.
(2) “State agency” means an Executive Branch agency, department,
commission, office, or board.
* * *
Sec. 75. 32 V.S.A. § 706 is amended to read:
§ 706. TRANSFER OF APPROPRIATIONS
Notwithstanding any authority granted elsewhere, all transfers of
appropriations shall be made pursuant to this section upon the initiative of the
Governor or upon the request of a secretary or commissioner.
(1) With the approval of the Governor, the Commissioner of Finance
and Management may transfer balances of appropriations not to exceed
$50,000.00 $100,000 made under any appropriation act for the support of the
government from one component of an agency, department, or other unit of
State government to any component of the same agency, department, or unit.
(2) Except as specified in subdivisions subdivision (1) and (4) of this
section, the transfer of balances of appropriations may be made only with the
approval of the Emergency Board.
(3) For the specific purpose of balancing and closing out fund accounts
at the end of a fiscal year, the Commissioner of Finance and Management may
adjust a balance within an account of an agency or department in an amount
not to exceed $100.00 $200.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 132 of 147
* * *
Sec. 76. 32 V.S.A. § 902 is amended to read:
§ 902. AUTHORIZATION TO BORROW MONEY
* * *
(b) The State Treasurer shall pay the interest on, principal of and expenses
of preparing, issuing, and marketing of such notes as the same fall due without
further order or authority from the General Fund or from the Transportation
or other applicable funds or from the proceeds of bonds or notes governmental
debt service funds established in section 951a of this chapter. The authority
hereby granted is in addition to and not in limitation of any other authority.
Such notes shall be sold at public or private sale with or without published
notice, as the State Treasurer may determine to be in the best interests of the
State.
Sec. 77. 32 V.S.A. § 951a is amended to read:
§ 951a. DEBT SERVICE FUNDS
(a) Three governmental debt service funds are hereby established:
* * *
(b) Financial resources in each fund shall consist of appropriations by the
General Assembly to fulfill debt service obligations, the transfer of funding
sources by the General Assembly to fulfill future debt service obligations, bond
proceeds raised to fund a permanent reserve required by a trust agreement

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 133 of 147
entered into to secure bonds, transfers of appropriations effected pursuant to
section 706 of this title, investment income earned on balances held in trust
agreement accounts as required by a trust agreement, and such other amounts
as directed by the General Assembly or that are specifically authorized by
provisions of this title. Each debt service fund shall account for the
accumulation of resources and the fulfillment of debt service obligations within
the current fiscal year and the accumulation of resources for debt service
obligations maturing in future fiscal years.
* * *
Sec. 78. 32 V.S.A. § 954 is amended to read:
§ 954. PROCEEDS
(a) The proceeds arising from the sale of bonds, inclusive of any premiums,
shall be applied to the purposes for which they were authorized, and the
purposes shall may be considered to include the expenses of preparing,
issuing, and marketing the bonds and any notes issued under section 955 of
this title, and underwriters’ fees and amounts for reserves, but no purchasers
of the bonds shall be in any way bound to see to the proper application of the
proceeds. The State Treasurer shall pay the interest on, principal of,
investment return on, and maturity value of the bonds and notes as the same
fall due or accrue without further order or authority. The State Treasurer, with
the approval of the Governor, may establish sinking funds, reserve funds, or

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 134 of 147
other special funds of the State as the State Treasurer may deem for the best
interests of the State. To the extent not otherwise provided, the amount
necessary each year to fulfill the maturing principal and interest of, investment
return and maturity value of, and sinking fund installments on all the bonds
then outstanding shall be included in and made a part of the annual
appropriation bill for the expense of State government, and the principal and
interest on, investment return and maturity value of, and sinking fund
installments on the bonds as may come due before appropriations for their
fulfillment have been made shall be fulfilled from the applicable debt service
fund.
(b) The State Treasurer is authorized to allocate the estimated cost of bond
issuance or issuances to the entities to which funds are appropriated by a
capital construction act and for which bonding is required as the source of
funds. If estimated receipts are insufficient, the State Treasurer shall allocate
additional costs to the entities. Any remaining receipts shall not be expended,
but carried forward to be available for future capital construction acts. If the
source of funds appropriated by a capital construction act is other than by
issuance of bonds, the State Treasurer is authorized to allocate the estimated
cost of ongoing debt management services to the entities to which those funds
are appropriated shall be appropriated annually from the funds from which
transfers are made to fund debt service costs.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 135 of 147
* * *
Sec. 79. VERMONT TRAUMATIC BRAIN INJURY FUND; REPEAL
(a) 33 V.S.A. chapter 78 (Vermont Traumatic Brain Injury Fund) is
repealed.
Sec. 80. 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 47, Sec. 38 is amended to read:
Sec. 38. RENTAL HOUSING REVOLVING LOAN PROGRAM
(a) Creation; administration. The Vermont Housing Finance Agency shall
design and implement a Rental Housing Revolving Loan Program and shall
create and administer a revolving loan fund to provide subsidized loans for
rental housing developments that serve middle-income households.
(b) Loans; eligibility; criteria.
* * *
(7) The Agency shall use one or more legal mechanisms to ensure that:
(A) a subsidized unit remains affordable to a household earning the
applicable percent of area median income for the longer of:
(i) seven years; or
(ii) full repayment of the loan plus three years; and
(B) during the affordability period determined pursuant to
subdivision (A) of this subdivision (7), the annual increase in rent for a
subsidized unit does not exceed three percent or an amount otherwise
authorized by the Agency.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 136 of 147
* * *
Sec. 81. 32 V.S.A. § 308b is amended to read:
§ 308b. HUMAN SERVICES CASELOAD RESERVE
(a) There is created within the General Fund a Human Services Caseload
Reserve. Expenditures from the Reserve shall be subject to an appropriation
by the General Assembly or approval by the Emergency Board. Expenditures
from the Reserve shall be limited to Agency of Human Services caseload-
related needs primarily in the Departments for Children and Families, of
Health, of Mental Health, of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living, of
Vermont Health Access, and settlement costs associated with managing the
Global Commitment waiver.
(b) The Secretary of Administration may transfer to the Human Services
Caseload Reserve any General Fund carry-forward carryforward directly
attributable to Agency of Human Services caseload reductions and the effective
management of related federal receipts, with the exclusion of the Department
of Corrections.
(c) The Human Services Caseload Reserve shall contain two sub-accounts
subaccounts:
(1) A sub-account subaccount for incurred but not reported Medicaid
expenses. Each fiscal year beginning with fiscal year 2020, the Department of
Finance and Management shall adjust the amount reserved for incurred but

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 137 of 147
not reported Medicaid expenses to equal the amount specified in the
Comprehensive Annual Comprehensive Financial Report for the fiscal year
occurring two years prior for the estimated amount of incurred but not
reported Medicaid expenses associated with the current Medicaid Global
Commitment waiver.
* * *
Sec. 82. CHILD CARE CONTRIBUTION SPECIAL FUND;
UNALLOCATED AND UNRESERVED BALANCE
(a) In fiscal year 2025, the Secretary of Administration shall unreserve and
transfer funds from the Human Services Caseload Reserve to the Child Care
Contribution Special Fund established in 32 V.S.A. § 10554 as necessary to
maintain a balance that appropriately supports the State’s statutory
obligations under the Child Care Financial Assistance Program established in
33 V.S.A. §§ 3512 and 3513.
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly that any unreserved and
unallocated balance in the Child Care Contribution Special Fund shall remain
in the Fund to support the future establishment of a reserve for the Child Care
Financial Assistance Program.
Sec. 83. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS; FACILITY WORK
PROGRAMS; STRATEGIC PLAN
(a) Findings and intent.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 138 of 147
(1) The General Assembly finds that a significant budget deficit has
developed within previously existing programs despite a wage structure that
pays incarcerated individuals in Vermont at rates ranging from $0.25 to $1.35
per hour, significantly below the federal minimum wage.
(2) It is the intent of the General Assembly that all Department of
Corrections facility work programs operate in a manner that is fiscally
sustainable to the extent possible within current statutory limitations and
effective in preparing offenders for meaningful employment upon release.
(b) Strategic plan. On or before December 15, 2025, the Department of
Corrections shall, in consultation with the Department of Labor, submit a
strategic plan with proposed benchmarks for improvement to the House
Committees on Appropriations and on Corrections and Institutions and the
Senate Committees on Appropriations, on Institutions, and on Judiciary. The
strategic plan shall include:
(1) A business plan to improve program efficiency and self-sustainability
to ensure all facility work programs, including Vermont Correctional
Industries, vocational training programs, and other paid facility duties,
operate without recurring deficits or to clearly identify funding sources to
address the deficits.
(2) A comprehensive evaluation of the skills provided through facility
work programs to determine if those skills are transferable to employment

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 139 of 147
opportunities post-incarceration. The evaluation shall include consideration
of expanding technical training and certification opportunities that carry
recognized value in the labor market.
(3) An analysis of facility work programs to determine if each program
serves a sufficient portion of the incarcerated population to justify its
administration. The analysis shall also consider whether participants gain
meaningful and valuable work experiences.
(4) A review of wages paid to facility work program participants, the
implications of wage structures on program outcomes, and the appropriate use
of funds in relation to program objectives.
(c) In fiscal years 2025 and 2026, the Department of Corrections shall
submit timely reports to the House Committees on Appropriations and on
Corrections and Institutions and the Senate Committees on Appropriations, on
Institutions, and on Judiciary, or the Joint Fiscal Committee and the Joint
Legislative Justice Oversight Committee when the General Assembly is not in
session, on the development of facility work program deficits. The Department
shall include in these reports any financial or operational actions taken to
address deficits, increase oversight, and prevent future deficits.
Sec. 84. MEDICAID PROVIDERS WITH STABILIZATION NEEDS;
GRANT ELIGIBILITY

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 140 of 147
(a) All Vermont Medicaid participating providers with demonstrated
stabilization needs and a plan to achieve sustainability shall be eligible to
apply for funds appropriated pursuant to 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec.
B.1100(o)(4), including substance use residential treatment facilities, federally
qualified health centers, residential mental health providers, and other
providers of health care and human services.
(b) On or before December 15, 2025, the Department of Vermont Health
Access shall submit a report to the House Committees on Health Care and on
Appropriations and the Senate Committees on Health and Welfare and on
Appropriations. The report shall include:
(1) A detailed account of grants distributed pursuant to the
appropriation made in 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. B.1100(o)(4), as
added by this act. This shall include the dollar amount and recipient of each
grant.
(2) A description of each grant recipient’s financial status prior to
receipt of the grant, a summary of the impact of the grant for each recipient,
and a summary of a revised long-term sustainability plan for each grant
recipient.
(3) An analysis of grant outcomes and any recommendations for
enhancing the financial stability of Vermont Medicaid providers.
Sec. 85. ADULT DIPLOMA PROGRAM AND HIGH SCHOOL

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 141 of 147
COMPLETION PROGRAM TRANSITIONAL STUDENTS
(a) Notwithstanding 16 V.S.A. § 945 and any other provision of law to the
contrary, a high school may award a high school diploma to any student who
meets the following criteria:
(1) Prior to July 1, 2024, the student was participating in the High
School Completion Program as the program existed under 16 V.S.A. § 943 on
June 30, 2024.
(2) The student has met the requirements of the student’s individual
graduation plan and would have been eligible to receive a diploma pursuant to
the High School Completion Program as it existed under 16 V.S.A. § 943 on
June 30, 2024.
(b) This section is repealed on July 1, 2025.
Sec. 86. SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM;
DISCRETIONARY EXEMPTIONS
(a) For the remainder of federal fiscal year 2025, the Department for
Children and Families shall utilize the State’s allocation of discretionary
exemptions in the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program to the extent
permitted by federal regulation for the purposes of:
(1) extending benefits to Program participants who would otherwise
experience a disruption of benefits; and

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 142 of 147
(2) ensuring that Program participants are not accruing any time-
limited benefit work requirement countable months.
Sec. 87. 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 19, Secs. 5 and 6 are amended to read:
Sec. 5. [Deleted.]
Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) Sec. 4 (marriage licenses; 32 V.S.A. § 1712) shall take effect on July 1,
2023.
(b) Sec. 5 (marriage licenses; 32 V.S.A. § 1712) shall take effect on July 1,
2025.
(c) All other sections shall take effect 30 calendar days after passage.
Sec. 88. 2022 Acts and Resolves No. 83, Sec. 53, as amended by 2022 Acts
and Resolves No. 185, Sec. C.102 is further amended to read:
Sec. 53. FISCAL YEAR 2022 UNALLOCATED RESERVE
* * *
(b) After meeting the requirements of subsection (a) of this section, but
prior to satisfying the requirements of 32 V.S.A. § 308c, the remaining
unreserved and undesignated funds at the close of fiscal year 2022 shall be
allocated to the extent available as follows:
* * *
(7) $9,600,000 is appropriated to the Judiciary, of which $3,880,000 is
for the reopening of the courts and $5,720,000, $4,920,000 is to replace HVAC

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 143 of 147
in county court houses, and $800,000 is to upgrade the network wiring and
security systems in county court houses.
* * *
Sec. 89. 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 69, Sec. 15b, as added by 2024 Acts and
Resolves No. 162, is amended to read:
Sec. 15b. SERGEANT AT ARMS
(a) The sum of $100,000.00 $100,000 is appropriated in FY fiscal year
2025 to the Sergeant at Arms for the following projects:
(1) the replacement of State House cafeteria furnishings; and
(2) the purchase and installation at the State House of an X-ray
machine designed to screen baggage.
Sec. 90. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. E.321 is amended to read:
Sec. E.321 GENERAL ASSISTANCE EMERGENCY HOUSING
* * *
(b)(1) General Assistance Emergency Housing shall be provided in a
community-based shelter whenever possible. If there is inadequate
community-based shelter space available within the Agency of Human Services
district in which the household presents itself, the household shall be provided
emergency housing in a hotel or motel within the district, if available, until
adequate community-based shelter space becomes available in the district.
The utilization of hotel and motel rooms pursuant to this subdivision shall be

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 144 of 147
capped at 1,100 rooms per night between September 15, 2024 through
November 30, 2024 and between April 1, 2025 through June 30, 2025.
* * *
(3) The Department shall provide emergency winter housing to
households meeting the eligibility criteria in subsection (a) of this section
between December 1, 2024 and March 31, June 30, 2025. Emergency housing
in a hotel or motel provided pursuant to this subdivision shall not count toward
the maximum days of eligibility per 12-month period provided in subdivision
(2) of this subsection.
* * *
Sec. 91. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 82, Sec. 1, as amended by 2024 Acts and
Resolves No. 108, Sec. 3, is further amended to read:
Sec. 1. REIMBURSEMENT TO MUNICIPALITIES OF STATE
EDUCATION PROPERTY TAXES THAT WERE ABATED DUE
TO FLOODING
(a)(1) The Commissioner of Taxes may approve an application by a
municipality for reimbursement of State education property tax payments owed
under 32 V.S.A. § 5402(c) and 16 V.S.A. § 426. To be eligible for
reimbursement under this section, prior to November 15, 2024 2025, a
municipality must have abated, in proportion to the abated municipal tax,
under 24 V.S.A. § 1535 the State education property taxes that were assessed

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 145 of 147
on eligible property, after application of any property tax credit allowed under
32 V.S.A. chapter 154.
(2) As used in this subsection, “eligible property” means property lost
or destroyed due directly or indirectly to severe storms and flooding in an area
that was declared a federal disaster between July 1, 2023 and October 15,
2023 December 31, 2024, provided the loss or destruction resulted in one or
more of the following:
(A) a 50 percent or greater loss in value to the primary structure on
the property;
(B) loss of use by the property owner of the primary structure on the
property for 60 days or more;
(C) loss of access by the property owner to utilities for the primary
structure on the property for 60 days or more; or
(D) condemnation of the primary structure on the property under
federal, State, or municipal law, as applicable.
(b) If a municipality demonstrates that, due to disruption to tax collections
resulting from flooding in an area that was declared a federal disaster between
July 1, 2023 and October 15, 2023 December 31, 2024, the municipality
incurred unanticipated interest expenses on funds borrowed to make State
education property tax payments owed under 32 V.S.A. § 5402(c) and 16 V.S.A.
§ 426, the municipality may be reimbursed by an amount equal to its

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 146 of 147
reasonable interest expenses under this subsection, provided the amount of
reimbursed interest expenses shall not exceed eight percent.
* * *
Sec. 92. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. E.106 is amended to read:
Sec. E.106 CORONAVIRUS STATE FISCAL RECOVERY FUND
APPROPRIATIONS; REVERSION AND ESTABLISHMENT
OF NEW SPENDING AUTHORITY
* * *
(b) The Commissioner of Finance and Management shall revert all
unobligated American Rescue Plan Act – Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery
Fund spending authority prior to December 31, 2024. The total amount of
American Rescue Plan Act – Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund
spending authority reverted in accordance with this subsection shall equal the
amount of new spending authority established pursuant to 32 V.S.A. § 511 for
the following purposes in the following order:
* * *
(3) $30,000,000 to the Vermont Housing and Conservation Board to
provide support and enhance capacity for the production and preservation of:
affordable mixed-income rental housing and homeownership units, including
improvements to manufactured homes and communities,; permanent homes
and emergency shelter for those experiencing homelessness,; recovery

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE AND SENATE H.141
2025 Page 147 of 147
residences,; and housing available to farm workers, refugees, and individuals
who are eligible to receive Medicaid-funded home and community based
services.
Sec. 93. CARRYFORWARD AUTHORITY
(a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law and subject to the
approval of the Secretary of Administration, General Fund, Transportation
Fund, Transportation Infrastructure Bond Fund, Education Fund, Technology
Modernization Special Fund (21951), Clean Water Fund (21932), and
Agricultural Water Quality Fund (21933) appropriations remaining
unexpended on June 30, 2025 in the Executive Branch shall be carried forward
and shall be designated for expenditure.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, General
Fund appropriations remaining unexpended on June 30, 2025 in the
Legislative and Judicial Branches shall be carried forward and shall be
designated for expenditure.
Sec. 94. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) This act shall take effect on passage, except that, notwithstanding
1 V.S.A. § 214:
(1) Sec. 67 shall take effect retroactively on July 1, 2024; and
(2) Sec. 91 shall take effect retroactively on November 15, 2024.